By (the winds) that scatter dust.
And (the clouds) that bear heavy weight of water;
And (the ships) that float with ease and gentleness;
And those (angels) who distribute (provisions, rain, and other blessings) by (Allah's) Command;-
Verily, that which you are promised (i.e. Resurrection in the Hereafter and receiving the reward or punishment of good or bad deeds, etc.) is surely true.
And verily, the Recompense is sure to happen.
By the heaven full of paths,
Certainly, you have different ideas (about Muhammad SAW and the Qur'an).
Turned aside therefrom (i.e. from Muhammad SAW and the Qur'an) is he who is turned aside (by the Decree and Preordainment of Allah).
Cursed be the liars,
Who are under a cover of heedlessness (think not about the gravity of the Hereafter),
They ask;"When will be the Day of Recompense?"
(It will be) a Day when they will be tried (i.e. burnt) over the Fire!
"Taste you your trial (burning)! This is what you used to ask to be hastened!"
Verily, the Muttaqun (pious - see V.2:2) will be in the midst of Gardens and Springs (in the Paradise),
Taking joy in the things which their Lord has given them. Verily, they were before this Muhsinun (good-doers - see V.2:112).
They used to sleep but little by night [invoking their Lord (Allah) and praying, with fear and hope].
And in the hours before dawn, they were (found) asking (Allah) for forgiveness,
And in their properties there was the right of the beggar, and the Mahrum (the poor who does not ask the others),
And on the earth are signs for those who have Faith with certainty,
And also in your ownselves. Will you not then see?
And in the heaven is your provision, and that which you are promised.
Then, by the Lord of the heaven and the earth, it is the truth (i.e. what has been promised to you), just as it is the truth that you can speak.
Has the story reached you, of the honoured guests [three angels; Jibrael (Gabriel) along with another two] of Ibrahim (Abraham)?
When they came in to him, and said, "Salam, (peace be upon you)!" He answered;"Salam, (peace be upon you )," and said: "You are a people unknown to me,"
Then he turned to his household, so brought out a roasted calf [as the property of Ibrahim (Abraham) was mainly cows].
And placed it before them, (saying): "Will you not eat?"
Then he conceived a fear of them (when they ate not). They said: "Fear not." And they gave him glad tidings of an intelligent son, having knowledge (about Allah and His religion of True Monotheism).
Then his wife came forward with a loud voice, she smote her face, and said: "A barren old woman!"
They said: "Even so says your Lord. Verily, He is the All-Wise, the All-Knower."
[Ibrahim (Abraham)] said: "Then for what purpose you have come, O Messengers?"
They said: "We have been sent to a people who are Mujrimun (polytheists, sinners, criminals, disbelievers in Allah);
To send down upon them stones of baked clay.
Marked by your Lord for the Musrifun (polytheists, criminals, sinners those who trespass Allah's set limits in evil-doings by committing great sins).
So We brought out from therein the believers.
But We found not there any household of the Muslims except one [i.e. Lout (Lot) and his two daughters].
And We have left there a sign (i.e. the place of the Dead Sea, well-known in Palestine) for those who fear the painful torment.
And in Musa (Moses) (too, there is a sign). When We sent him to Fir'aun (Pharaoh) with a manifest authority.
But [Fir'aun (Pharaoh)] turned away (from Belief in might) along with his hosts, and said: "A sorcerer, or a madman."
So We took him and his hosts, and dumped them into the sea, while he was to be blamed.
And in 'Ad (there is also a sign) when We sent against them the barren wind;
It spared nothing that it reached, but blew it into broken spreads of rotten ruins.
And in Thamud (there is also a sign), when they were told: "Enjoy yourselves for a while!"
But they insolently defied the Command of their Lord, so the Sa'iqah overtook them while they were looking.
Then they were unable to rise up, nor could they help themselves.
(So were) the people of Nuh (Noah) before them. Verily, they were a people who were Fasiqun (rebellious, disobedient to Allah).
With power did We construct the heaven. Verily, We are Able to extend the vastness of space thereof.
And We have spread out the earth, how Excellent Spreader (thereof) are We!
And of everything We have created pairs, that you may remember (the Grace of Allah).
So flee to Allah (from His Torment to His Mercy Islamic Monotheism), verily, I (Muhammad SAW) am a plain warner to you from Him.
And set not up (or worship) any other ilahan (god) along with Allah [Glorified be He (Alone), Exalted above all that they associate as partners with Him]. Verily, I (Muhammad SAW) am a plain warner to you from Him.
Likewise, no Messenger came to those before them, but they said: "A sorcerer or a madman!"
Have they (the people of the past) transmitted this saying to these (Quraish pagans)? Nay, they are themselves a people transgressing beyond bounds (in disbelief)!
So turn away (O Muhammad SAW) from them (Quraish pagans) you are not to be blamed (as you have conveyed Allah's Message).
And remind (by preaching the Qur'an, O Muhammad SAW) for verily, the reminding profits the believers.
And I (Allah) created not the jinns and humans except they should worship Me (Alone).
I seek not any provision from them (i.e. provision for themselves or for My creatures) nor do I ask that they should feed Me (i.e. feed themselves or My creatures).
Verily, Allah is the All-Provider, Owner of Power, the Most Strong.
And verily, for those who do wrong, there is a portion of torment like to the evil portion of torment (which came for) their likes (of old), so let them not ask Me to hasten on!
Then, woe to those who disbelieve (in Allah and His Oneness Islamic Monotheism) from (that) their Day which they have been promised (for their punishment).
By the Mount;
And by the Book Inscribed.
In parchment unrolled.
And by the Bait-ul-Ma'mur (the house over the heavens parable to the Ka'bah at Makkah, continuously visited by the angels);
And by the roof raised high (i.e. the heaven).
And by the sea kept filled (or it will be fire kindled on the Day of Resurrection).
Verily, the Torment of your Lord will surely come to pass,
There is none that can avert it;
On the Day when the heaven will shake with a dreadful shaking,
And the mountains will move away with a (horrible) movement.
Then woe that Day to the beliers;
Who are playing in falsehood.
The Day when they will be pushed down by force to the Fire of Hell, with a horrible, forceful pushing.
This is the Fire which you used to belie.
Is this magic, or do you not see?
Taste you therein its heat, and whether you are patient of it or impatient of it, it is all the same. You are only being requited for what you used to do.
Verily, the Muttaqun (pious - see V.2:2) will be in Gardens (Paradise), and Delight.
Enjoying in that which their Lord has bestowed on them, and (the fact that) their Lord saved them from the torment of the blazing Fire.
"Eat and drink with happiness because of what you used to do."
They will recline (with ease) on thrones arranged in ranks. And We shall marry them to Houris (female, fair ones) with wide lovely eyes.
And those who believe and whose offspring follow them in Faith, to them shall We join their offspring, and We shall not decrease the reward of their deeds in anything. Every person is a pledge for that which he has earned.
And We shall provide them with fruit and meat, such as they desire.
There they shall pass from hand to hand a (wine) cup, free from any Laghw (dirty, false, evil vague talk between them), and free from sin (because it will be legal for them to drink).
And there will go round boy-servants of theirs, to serve them as if they were preserved pearls.
And some of them draw near to others, questioning.
Saying: "Aforetime, we were afraid with our families (from the punishment of Allah).
"But Allah has been gracious to us, and has saved us from the torment of the Fire.
"Verily, We used to invoke Him (Alone and none else) before. Verily, He is Al-Barr (the Most Subtle, Kind, Courteous, and Generous), the Most Merciful."
Therefore, remind and preach (mankind, O Muhammad SAW of Islamic Monotheism). By the Grace of Allah, you are neither a soothsayer, nor a madman.
Or do they say: "(Muhammad SAW is) a poet! We await for him some calamity by time.!"
Say (O Muhammad SAW to them): "Wait! I am with you, among the waiters!"
Do their minds command them this [i.e. to tell a lie against you (Muhammad SAW)] or are they people exceeding the bounds (i.e. from Belief in Allah to disbelief).
Or do they say: "He (Muhammad SAW) has forged it (this Qur'an)?" Nay! They believe not!
Let them then produce a recital like unto it (the Qur'an) if they are truthful.
Were they created by nothing, or were they themselves the creators?
Or did they create the heavens and the earth? Nay, but they have no firm Belief.
Or are with them the treasures of your Lord? Or are they the tyrants with the authority to do as they like?
Or have they a stairway (to heaven), by means of which they listen (to the talks of the angels)? Then let their listener produce some manifest proof.
Or has He (Allah) only daughters and you have sons?
Or is it that you (O Muhammad SAW) ask a wage from them (for your preaching of Islamic Monotheism) so that they are burdened with a load of debt?
Or that the Ghaib (unseen) is with them, and they write it down?
Or do they intend a plot (against you O Muhammad SAW)? But those who disbelieve (in the Oneness of Allah Islamic Monotheism) are themselves in a plot!
Or have they an ilah (a god) other than Allah? Glorified be Allah from all that they ascribe as partners (to Him)
And if they were to see a piece of the heaven falling down, they would say: "Clouds gathered in heaps!"
So leave them alone till they meet their Day, in which they will sink into a fainting (with horror).
The Day when their plotting shall not avail them at all nor will they be helped (i.e. they will receive their torment in Hell).
And verily, for those who do wrong, there is another punishment (i.e. the torment in this world and in their graves) before this, but most of them know not.
So wait patiently (O Muhammad SAW) for the Decision of your Lord, for verily, you are under Our Eyes, and glorify the Praises of your Lord when you get up from sleep.
And in the night-time, also glorify His Praises, and at the setting of the stars.
By the star when it goes down, (or vanishes).
Your companion (Muhammad SAW) has neither gone astray nor has erred.
Nor does he speak of (his own) desire.
It is only an Inspiration that is inspired.
He has been taught (this Qur'an) by one mighty in power [Jibrael (Gabriel)].
Dhu Mirrah (free from any defect in body and mind), Fastawa [then he (Jibrael - Gabriel) rose and became stable].
While he [Jibrael (Gabriel)] was in the highest part of the horizon,
Then he [Jibrael (Gabriel)] approached and came closer,
And was at a distance of two bows' length or (even) nearer,
So did (Allah) convey the Inspiration to His slave [Muhammad SAW through Jibrael (Gabriel)].
The (Prophet's) heart lied not (in seeing) what he (Muhammad SAW) saw.
Will you then dispute with him (Muhammad SAW) about what he saw [during the Mi'raj: (Ascent of the Prophet SAW over the seven heavens)].
And indeed he (Muhammad SAW) saw him [Jibrael (Gabriel)] at a second descent (i.e. another time).
Near Sidrat-ul-Muntaha [lote-tree of the utmost boundary (beyond which none can pass)],
Near it is the Paradise of Abode.
When that covered the lote-tree which did cover it!
The sight (of Prophet Muhammad SAW) turned not aside (right or left), nor it transgressed beyond (the) limit (ordained for it).
Indeed he (Muhammad SAW) did see, of the Greatest Signs, of his Lord (Allah).
Have you then considered Al-Lat, and Al-'Uzza (two idols of the pagan Arabs)
And Manat (another idol of the pagan Arabs), the other third?
Is it for you the males and for Him the females?
That indeed is a division most unfair!
They are but names which you have named, you and your fathers, for which Allah has sent down no authority. They follow but a guess and that which they themselves desire, whereas there has surely come to them the Guidance from their Lord!
Or shall man have what he wishes?
But to Allah belongs the last (Hereafter) and the first (the world).
And there are many angels in the heavens, whose intercession will avail nothing except after Allah has given leave for whom He wills and pleases.
Verily, those who believe not in the Hereafter, name the angels with female names.
While they have no knowledge thereof. They follow but a guess, and verily, guess is no substitute for the truth.
Therefore withdraw (O Muhammad SAW) from him who turns away from Our Reminder (this Qur'an) and desires nothing but the life of this world.
That is what they could reach of knowledge. Verily, your Lord it is He Who knows best him who goes astray from His Path, and He knows best him who receives guidance.
And to Allah belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is in the earth, that He may requite those who do evil with that which they have done (i.e. punish them in Hell), and reward those who do good, with what is best (i.e. Paradise).
Those who avoid great sins (see the Qur'an, Verses: 6:152,153) and Al-Fawahish (illegal sexual intercourse, etc.) except the small faults, verily, your Lord is of vast forgiveness. He knows you well when He created you from the earth (Adam), and when you were fetuses in your mothers' wombs. So ascribe not purity to yourselves. He knows best him who fears Allah and keep his duty to Him [i.e. those who are Al-Muttaqun (pious - see V.2:2)].
Did you (O Muhammad SAW) observe him who turned away (from Islam).
And gave a little, then stopped (giving)?
Is with him the knowledge of the unseen so that he sees?
Or is he not informed with what is in the Pages (Scripture) of Musa (Moses),
And of Ibrahim (Abraham) who fulfilled (or conveyed) all that (what Allah ordered him to do or convey),
That no burdened person (with sins) shall bear the burden (sins) of another,
And that man can have nothing but what he does (good or bad),
And that his deeds will be seen,
Then he will be recompensed with a full and the best recompense
And that to your Lord (Allah) is the End (Return of everything).
And that it is He (Allah) Who makes (whom He wills) laugh, and makes (whom He wills) weep;
And that it is He (Allah) Who causes death and gives life;
And that He (Allah) creates the pairs, male and female,
From Nutfah (drops of semen male and female discharges) when it is emitted;
And that upon Him (Allah) is another bringing forth (Resurrection);
And that it is He (Allah) Who gives much or a little (or gives wealth and contentment),
And that He (Allah) is the Lord of Sirius (the star which the pagan Arabs used to worship);
And that it is He (Allah) Who destroyed the former 'Ad (people),
And Thamud (people). He spared none of them.
And the people of Nuh (Noah) aforetime, verily, they were more unjust and more rebellious and transgressing [in disobeying Allah and His Messenger Nuh (Noah)].
And He destroyed the overthrown cities [of Sodom to which Prophet Lout (Lot) was sent].
So there covered them that which did cover (i.e. torment with stones).
Then which of the Graces of your Lord (O man!) will you doubt.
This (Muhammad SAW) is a warner (Messenger) of the (series of) warners (Messengers) of old.
The Day of Resurrection draws near,
None besides Allah can avert it, (or advance it, or delay it).
Do you then wonder at this recital (the Qur'an)?
And you laugh at it and weep not,
Wasting your (precious) lifetime in pastime and amusements (singing, etc.).
So fall you down in prostration to Allah, and worship Him (Alone).
The Hour has drawn near, and the moon has been cleft asunder (the people of Makkah requested Prophet Muhammad SAW to show them a miracle, so he showed them the splitting of the moon).
And if they see a sign, they turn away, and say: "This is continuous magic."
They belied (the Verses of Allah, this Qur'an), and followed their own lusts. And every matter will be settled [according to the kind of deeds (for the doer of good deeds, his deeds will take him to Paradise, and similarly evil deeds will take their doers to Hell)].
And indeed there has come to them news (in this Qur'an) wherein there is (enough warning) to check (them from evil),
Perfect wisdom (this Qur'an), but (the preaching of) warners benefit them not,
So (O Muhammad SAW) withdraw from them. The Day that the caller will call (them) to a terrible thing.
They will come forth, with humbled eyes from (their) graves as if they were locusts spread abroad,
Hastening towards the caller, the disbelievers will say: "This is a hard Day."
The people of Nuh (Noah) denied (their Messenger) before them, they rejected Our slave, and said: "A madman!" and he was insolently rebuked and threatened.
Then he invoked his Lord (saying): "I have been overcome, so help (me)!"
So We opened the gates of heaven with water pouring forth.
And We caused the earth to gush forth with springs. So the waters (of the heaven and the earth) met for a matter predestined.
And We carried him on a (ship) made of planks and nails,
Floating under Our Eyes, a reward for him who had been rejected!
And indeed, We have left this as a sign, then is there any that will remember (or receive admonition)?
Then how (terrible) was My Torment and My Warnings?
And We have indeed made the Qur'an easy to understand and remember, then is there any that will remember (or receive admonition)?
'Ad (people) belied (their Prophet, Hud), then how (terrible) was My Torment and My Warnings?
Verily, We sent against them a furious wind of harsh voice on a day of evil omen and continuous calamity.
Plucking out men as if they were uprooted stems of date-palms.
Then, how (terrible) was My Torment and My Warnings?
And We have indeed made the Qur'an easy to understand and remember, then is there any that will remember (or receive admonition)?
Thamud (people also) belied the warnings.
For they said: "A man! Alone from among us, that we are to follow? Truly, then we should be in error and distress or madness!"
"Is it that the Reminder is sent to him [Prophet Salih (Saleh)] alone from among us? Nay, he is an insolent liar!"
Tomorrow they will come to know, who is the liar, the insolent one!
Verily, We are sending the she-camel as a test for them. So watch them [O Salih (Saleh)], and be patient!
And inform them that the water is to be shared between (her and) them. Each one's right to drink being established (by turns).
But they called their comrade and he took (a sword) and killed (her).
Then, how (terrible) was My Torment and My Warnings?
Verily, We sent against them a single Saihah (torment - awful cry, etc.), and they became like the dry stubble of a fold-builder.
And indeed, We have made the Qur'an easy to understand and remember, then is there any that will remember (or receive admonition)?
The people of Lout (Lot) belied the warnings.
Verily, We sent against them a violent storm of stones (which destroyed them all), except the family of Lout (Lot), whom We saved in last hour of the night,
As a Favour from Us, thus do We reward him who gives thanks (by obeying Us).
And he [Lout (Lot)] indeed had warned them of Our Grasp, but they did doubt the warnings!
And they indeed sought to shame his guest (by asking to commit sodomy with them). So We blinded their eyes, "Then taste you My Torment and My Warnings."
And verily, an abiding torment seized them early in the morning.
"Then taste you My Torment and My Warnings."
And indeed, We have made the Qur'an easy to understand and remember, then is there any that will remember (or receive admonition)?
And indeed, warnings came to the people of Fir'aun (Pharaoh) [through Musa (Moses) and Harun (Aaron)].
(They) belied all Our Signs, so We seized them with a Seizure of the All-Mighty, All-Capable to carry out what he Will (Omnipotent).
Are your disbelievers (O Quraish!) better than these [nations of Nuh (Noah), Lout (Lot), Salih (Saleh), and the people of Fir'aun (Pharaoh), etc., who were destroyed)? Or have you an immunity (against Our Torment) in the Divine Scriptures?
Or do they say: "We are a great multitude, and we shall be victorious.?"
Their multitude will be put to flight, and they will show their backs.
Nay, but the Hour is their appointed time (for their full recompense), and the Hour will be more grievous and more bitter.
Verily, the Mujrimun (polytheists, disbelievers, sinners, criminals, etc.) are in error (in this world) and will burn (in the Hell-fire in the Hereafter).
The Day they will be dragged in the Fire on their faces (it will be said to them): "Taste you the touch of Hell!"
Verily, We have created all things with Qadar (Divine Preordainments of all things before their creation, as written in the Book of Decrees Al-Lauh Al-Mahfuz).
And Our Commandment is but one, as the twinkling of an eye.
And indeed, We have destroyed your likes, then is there any that will remember (or receive admonition)?
And each and everything they have done is noted in (their) Records (of deeds).
And everything, small and big is written (in Al-Lauh Al-Mahfuz already beforehand i.e. before it befalls, or is done by its doer (See the Qur'an V.57:22).
Verily, The Muttaqun (pious), will be in the midst of Gardens and Rivers (Paradise).
In a seat of truth (i.e. Paradise), near the Omnipotent King (Allah, the All-Blessed, the Most High, the Owner of Majesty and Honour).
The Most Beneficent (Allah)!
Has taught (you mankind) the Qur'an (by His Mercy).
He created man.
He taught him eloquent speech.
The sun and the moon run on their fixed courses (exactly) calculated with measured out stages for each (for reckoning, etc.).
And the herbs (or stars) and the trees both prostrate.
And the heaven He has raised high, and He has set up the Balance.
In order that you may not transgress (due) balance.
And observe the weight with equity and do not make the balance deficient.
And the earth He has put for the creatures.
Therein are fruits, date-palms producing sheathed fruit-stalks (enclosing dates).
And also corn, with (its) leaves and stalk for fodder, and sweet-scented plants.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
He created man (Adam) from sounding clay like the clay of pottery.
And the jinns did He create from a smokeless flame of fire.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
(He is) the Lord of the two easts (places of sunrise during early summer and early winter) and the Lord of the two wests (places of sunset during early summer and early winter).
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
He has let loosed the two seas (the salt water and the sweet) meeting together.
Between them is a barrier which none of them can transgress.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Out of them both come out pearl and coral.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
And His are the ships going and coming in the seas, like mountains.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Whatsoever is on it (the earth) will perish.
And the Face of your Lord full of Majesty and Honour will abide forever.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Whosoever is in the heavens and on earth begs of Him (its needs from Him). Every day He has a matter to bring forth (such as giving honour to some, disgrace to some, life to some, death to some, etc.)!
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
We shall attend to you, O you two classes (jinns and men)!
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
O assembly of jinns and men! If you have power to pass beyond the zones of the heavens and the earth, then pass (them)! But you will never be able to pass them, except with authority (from Allah)!
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
There will be sent against you both, smokeless flames of fire and (molten) brass, and you will not be able to defend yourselves.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Then when the heaven is rent asunder, and it becomes rosy or red like red-oil, or red hide.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
So on that Day no question will be asked of man or jinn as to his sin, (because they have already been known from their faces either white or black).
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
The Mujrimun (polytheists, criminals, sinners, etc.) will be known by their marks (black faces), and they will be seized by their forelocks and their feet.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
This is Hell which the Mujrimun (polytheists, criminals, sinners, etc.) denied.
They will go between it (Hell) and the boiling hot water!
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
But for him who [the true believer of Islamic Monotheism who performs all the duties ordained by Allah and His Messenger Muhammad SAW, and keeps away (abstain) from all kinds of sin and evil deeds prohibited in Islam and] fears the standing before his Lord, there will be two Gardens (i.e. in Paradise).
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
With spreading branches;
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
In them (both) will be two springs flowing (free)
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
In them (both) will be every kind of fruit in pairs.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Reclining upon the couches lined with silk brocade, and the fruits of the two Gardens will be near at hand.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Wherein both will be those (maidens) restraining their glances upon their husbands, whom no man or jinn yatmithhunna (has opened their hymens with sexual intercourse) before them.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
(In beauty) they are like rubies and coral.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Is there any reward for good other than good?
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
And besides these two, there are two other Gardens (i.e. in Paradise).
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Dark green (in colour).
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
In them (both) will be two springs gushing forth water.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
In them (both) will be fruits, and date- palms and pomegranates.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Therein (gardens) will be fair (wives) good and beautiful;
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Houris (beautiful, fair females) restrained in pavilions;
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Whom no man or jinn yatmithhunna (has opened their hymens with sexual intercourse) before them.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Reclining on green cushions and rich beautiful mattresses.
Then which of the Blessings of your Lord will you both (jinns and men) deny?
Blessed be the Name of your Lord (Allah), the Owner of Majesty and Honour.
When the Event (i.e. the Day of Resurrection) befalls.
And there can be no denying of its befalling.
It will bring low (some); (and others) it will exalt;
When the earth will be shaken with a terrible shake.
And the mountains will be powdered to dust.
So that they will become floating dust particles.
And you (all) will be in three kinds (i.e. separate groups).
So those on the Right Hand (i.e. those who will be given their Records in their right hands), Who will be those on the Right Hand? (As a respect for them, because they will enter Paradise).
And those on the Left Hand (i.e. those who will be given their Record in their left hands), Who will be those on the Left Hand? (As a disgrace for them, because they will enter Hell).
And those foremost [(in Islamic Faith of Monotheism and in performing righteous deeds) in the life of this world on the very first call for to embrace Islam,] will be foremost (in Paradise).
These will be those nearest to Allah.
In the Gardens of delight (Paradise).
A multitude of those (foremost) will be from the first generations (who embraced Islam).
And a few of those (foremost) will be from the later time (generations).
(They will be) on thrones woven with gold and precious stones,
Reclining thereon, face to face.
They will be served by immortal boys,
With cups, and jugs, and a glass from the flowing wine,
Wherefrom they will get neither any aching of the head, nor any intoxication.
And fruit; that they may choose.
And the flesh of fowls that they desire.
And (there will be) Houris (fair females) with wide, lovely eyes (as wives for the pious),
Like unto preserved pearls.
A reward for what they used to do.
No Laghw (dirty, false, evil vain talk) will they hear therein, nor any sinful speech (like backbiting, etc.).
But only the saying of: Salam!, Salam! (greetings with peace) !
And those on the Right Hand, - Who will be those on the Right Hand?
(They will be) among thornless lote-trees,
Among Talh (banana-trees) with fruits piled one above another,
In shade long-extended,
By water flowing constantly,
And fruit in plenty,
Whose season is not limited, and their supply will not be cut off,
And on couches or thrones, raised high.
Verily, We have created them (maidens) of special creation.
And made them virgins.
Loving (their husbands only), equal in age.
For those on the Right Hand.
A multitude of those (on the Right Hand) will be from the first generation (who embraced Islam).
And a multitude of those (on the Right Hand) will be from the later times (generations).
And those on the Left Hand Who will be those on the Left Hand?
In fierce hot wind and boiling water,
And shadow of black smoke,
(That shadow) neither cool, nor (even) good,
Verily, before that, they indulged in luxury,
And were persisting in great sin (joining partners in worship along with Allah, committing murders and other crimes, etc.)
And they used to say: "When we die and become dust and bones, shall we then indeed be resurrected?
"And also our forefathers?"
Say (O Muhammad SAW): "(Yes) verily, those of old, and those of later times.
"All will surely be gathered together for appointed Meeting of a known Day.
"Then moreover, verily, you the erring-ones, the deniers (of Resurrection)!
"You verily will eat of the trees of Zaqqum.
"Then you will fill your bellies therewith,
"And drink boiling water on top of it,
"So you will drink (that) like thirsty camels!"
That will be their entertainment on the Day of Recompense!
We created you, then why do you believe not?
Then tell Me (about) the human semen that you emit.
Is it you who create it (i.e. make this semen into a perfect human being), or are We the Creator?
We have decreed death to you all, and We are not unable,
To transfigure you and create you in (forms) that you know not.
And indeed, you have already known the first form of creation (i.e. the creation of Adam), why then do you not remember or take heed?
Tell Me! The seed that you sow in the ground.
Is it you that make it grow, or are We the Grower?
Were it Our Will, We could crumble it to dry pieces, and you would be regretful (or left in wonderment).
(Saying): "We are indeed Mughramun (i.e. ruined or lost the money without any profit, or punished by the loss of all that we spend for cultivation, etc.)!
"Nay, but we are deprived!"
Tell Me! The water that you drink.
Is it you who cause it from the rainclouds to come down, or are We the Causer of it to come down?
If We willed, We verily could make it salt (and undrinkable), why then do you not give thanks (to Allah)?
Tell Me! The fire which you kindle,
Is it you who made the tree thereof to grow, or are We the Grower?
We have made it a Reminder (for the Hell-fire, in the Hereafter); and an article of use for the travellers (and all the others, in this world).
Then glorify with praises the Name of your Lord, the Most Great.
So I swear by Mawaqi (setting or the mansions, etc.) of the stars (they traverse).
And verily, that is indeed a great oath, if you but know.
That (this) is indeed an honourable recital (the Noble Qur'an).
In a Book well-guarded (with Allah in the heaven i.e. Al-Lauh Al-Mahfuz).
Which (that Book with Allah) none can touch but the purified (i.e. the angels).
A Revelation (this Qur'an) from the Lord of the 'Alamin (mankind, jinns and all that exists).
Is it such a talk (this Qur'an) that you (disbelievers) deny?
And instead (of thanking Allah) for the provision He gives you, on the contrary, you deny Him (by disbelief)!
Then why do you not (intervene) when (the soul of a dying person) reaches the throat?
And you at the moment are looking on,
But We (i.e. Our angels who take the soul) are nearer to him than you, but you see not,
Then why do you not, if you are exempt from the reckoning and recompense (punishment, etc.)
Bring back the soul (to its body), if you are truthful?
Then, if he (the dying person) be of the Muqarrabun (those brought near to Allah),
(There is for him) rest and provision, and a Garden of delights (Paradise).
And if he (the dying person) be of those on the Right Hand,
Then there is safety and peace (from the Punishment of Allah) for (you as you are from) those on the Right Hand.
But if he (the dying person) be of the denying (of the Resurrection), the erring (away from the Right Path of Islamic Monotheism),
Then for him is entertainment with boiling water.
And burning in Hell-fire.
Verily, this! This is an absolute Truth with certainty.
So glorify with praises the Name of your Lord, the Most Great.
Whatsoever is in the heavens and the earth glorifies Allah, and He is the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
His is the kingdom of the heavens and the earth, It is He Who gives life and causes death; and He is Able to do all things.
He is the First (nothing is before Him) and the Last (nothing is after Him), the Most High (nothing is above Him) and the Most Near (nothing is nearer than Him). And He is the All-Knower of every thing.
He it is Who created the heavens and the earth in six Days and then Istawa (rose over) the Throne (in a manner that suits His Majesty). He knows what goes into the earth and what comes forth from it, what descends from the heaven and what ascends thereto. And He is with you (by His Knowledge) wheresoever you may be. And Allah is the All-Seer of what you do.
His is the kingdom of the heavens and the earth. And to Allah return all the matters (for decision).
He merges night into day (i.e. the decrease in the hours of the night is added into the hours of the day), and merges day into night (i.e. the decrease in the hours of the day is added into the hours of the night), and He has full knowledge of whatsoever is in the breasts.
Believe in Allah and His Messenger (Muhammad SAW), and spend of that whereof He has made you trustees. And such of you as believe and spend (in Allah's Way), theirs will be a great reward.
And what is the matter with you that you believe not in Allah! While the Messenger (Muhammad SAW) invites you to believe in your Lord (Allah), and He (Allah) has indeed taken your covenant, if you are real believers.
It is He Who sends down manifest Ayat (proofs, evidences, verses, lessons, signs, revelations, etc.) to His slave (Muhammad SAW) that He may bring you out from darkness into light. And verily, Allah is to you full of kindness, Most Merciful.
And what is the matter with you that you spend not in the Cause of Allah? And to Allah belongs the heritage of the heavens and the earth. Not equal among you are those who spent and fought before the conquering (of Makkah) (with those among you who did so later). Such are higher in degree than those who spent and fought afterwards. But to all, Allah has promised the best (reward). And Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
Who is he that will lend to Allah a goodly loan, then (Allah) will increase it manifold to his credit (in repaying), and he will have (besides) a good reward (i.e. Paradise).
On the Day you shall see the believing men and the believing women their light running forward before them and by their right hands. Glad tidings for you this Day! Gardens under which rivers flow (Paradise), to dwell therein forever! Truly, this is the great success!
On the Day when the hypocrites men and women will say to the believers: "Wait for us! Let us get something from your light!" It will be said: "Go back to your rear! Then seek a light!" So a wall will be put up between them, with a gate therein. Inside it will be mercy, and outside it will be torment."
(The hypocrites) will call the believers: "Were we not with you?" The believers will reply: "Yes! But you led yourselves into temptations, you looked forward for our destruction; you doubted (in Faith); and you were deceived by false desires, till the Command of Allah came to pass. And the chief deceiver (Satan) deceived you in respect of Allah."
So this Day no ransom shall be taken from you (hypocrites), nor of those who disbelieved, (in the Oneness of Allah Islamic Monotheism). Your abode is the Fire, that is the proper place for you, and worst indeed is that destination.
Has not the time come for the hearts of those who believe (in the Oneness of Allah - Islamic Monotheism) to be affected by Allah's Reminder (this Qur'an), and that which has been revealed of the truth, lest they become as those who received the Scripture [the Taurat (Torah) and the Injeel (Gospel)] before (i.e. Jews and Christians), and the term was prolonged for them and so their hearts were hardened? And many of them were Fasiqun (rebellious, disobedient to Allah).
Know that Allah gives life to the earth after its death! Indeed We have made clear the Ayat (proofs, evidences, verses, lessons, signs, revelations, etc.) to you, if you but understand.
Verily, those who give Sadaqat (i.e. Zakat and alms, etc.), men and women, and lend to Allah a goodly loan, it shall be increased manifold (to their credit), and theirs shall be an honourable good reward (i.e. Paradise).
And those who believe in (the Oneness of) Allah and His Messengers, they are the Siddiqun (i.e. those followers of the Prophets who were first and foremost to believe in them), and the martyrs with their Lord, they shall have their reward and their light. But those who disbelieve (in the Oneness of Allah - Islamic Monotheism) and deny Our Ayat (proofs, evidences, verses, lessons, signs, revelations, etc.), they shall be the dwellers of the blazing Fire.
Know that the life of this world is only play and amusement, pomp and mutual boasting among you, and rivalry in respect of wealth and children, as the likeness of vegetation after rain, thereof the growth is pleasing to the tiller; afterwards it dries up and you see it turning yellow; then it becomes straw. But in the Hereafter (there is) a severe torment (for the disbelievers, evil-doers), and (there is) Forgiveness from Allah and (His) Good Pleasure (for the believers, good-doers), whereas the life of this world is only a deceiving enjoyment.
Race one with another in hastening towards Forgiveness from your Lord (Allah), and towards Paradise, the width whereof is as the width of heaven and earth, prepared for those who believe in Allah and His Messengers. That is the Grace of Allah which He bestows on whom He pleases. And Allah is the Owner of Great Bounty.
No calamity befalls on the earth or in yourselves but is inscribed in the Book of Decrees (Al-Lauh Al-Mahfuz), before We bring it into existence. Verily, that is easy for Allah.
In order that you may not be sad over matters that you fail to get, nor rejoice because of that which has been given to you. And Allah likes not prideful boasters.
Those who are misers and enjoin upon people miserliness (Allah is not in need of their charity). And whosoever turns away (from Faith Allah's Monotheism), then Allah is Rich (Free of all wants), Worthy of all praise.
Indeed We have sent Our Messengers with clear proofs, and revealed with them the Scripture and the Balance (justice) that mankind may keep up justice. And We brought forth iron wherein is mighty power (in matters of war), as well as many benefits for mankind, that Allah may test who it is that will help Him (His religion), and His Messengers in the unseen. Verily, Allah is All-Strong, All-Mighty.
And indeed, We sent Nuh (Noah) and Ibrahim (Abraham), and placed in their offspring Prophethood and Scripture, and among them there is he who is guided, but many of them are Fasiqun (rebellious, disobedient to Allah).
Then, We sent after them, Our Messengers, and We sent 'Iesa (Jesus) - son of Maryam (Mary), and gave him the Injeel (Gospel). And We ordained in the hearts of those who followed him, compassion and mercy. But the Monasticism which they invented for themselves, We did not prescribe for them, but (they sought it) only to please Allah therewith, but that they did not observe it with the right observance. So We gave those among them who believed, their (due) reward, but many of them are Fasiqun (rebellious, disobedient to Allah).
O you who believe [in Musa (Moses) (i.e. Jews) and 'Iesa (Jesus) (i.e. Christians)]! Fear Allah, and believe too in His Messenger (Muhammad SAW), He will give you a double portion of His Mercy, and He will give you a light by which you shall walk (straight), and He will forgive you. And Allah is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
So that the people of the Scripture (Jews and Christians) may know that they have no power whatsoever over the Grace of Allah, and that (His) Grace is (entirely) in His Hand to bestow it on whomsoever He wills. And Allah is the Owner of Great Bounty.
Indeed Allah has heard the statement of her (Khaulah bint Tha'labah) that disputes with you (O Muhammad SAW) concerning her husband (Aus bin As-Samit), and complains to Allah. And Allah hears the argument between you both. Verily, Allah is All-Hearer, All-Seer.
Those among you who make their wives unlawful (Az-Zihar ) to them by saying to them "You are like my mother's back." They cannot be their mothers. None can be their mothers except those who gave them birth. And verily, they utter an ill word and a lie. And verily, Allah is Oft-Pardoning, Oft-Forgiving.
And those who make unlawful to them (their wives) (by Az-Zihar ) and wish to free themselves from what they uttered, (the penalty) in that case (is) the freeing of a slave before they touch each other. That is an admonition to you (so that you may not return to such an ill thing). And Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
And he who finds not (the money for freeing a slave) must fast two successive months before they both touch each other. And for him who is unable to do so, he should feed sixty of Miskin (poor). That is in order that you may have perfect Faith in Allah and His Messenger. These are the limits set by Allah. And for disbelievers, there is a painful torment.
Verily, those who oppose Allah and His Messenger (Muhammad SAW) will be disgraced, as those before them (among the past nation), were disgraced. And We have sent down clear Ayat (proofs, evidences, verses, lessons, signs, revelations, etc.). And for the disbelievers is a disgracing torment.
On the Day when Allah will resurrect them all together (i.e. the Day of Resurrection) and inform them of what they did. Allah has kept account of it, while they have forgotten it. And Allah is Witness over all things.
Have you not seen that Allah knows whatsoever is in the heavens and whatsoever is on the earth? There is no Najwa (secret counsel) of three, but He is their fourth (with His Knowledge, while He Himself is over the Throne, over the seventh heaven), nor of five but He is their sixth (with His Knowledge), not of less than that or more, but He is with them (with His Knowledge) wheresoever they may be; and afterwards on the Day of Resurrection, He will inform them of what they did. Verily, Allah is the All-Knower of everything.
Have you not seen those who were forbidden to hold secret counsels, and afterwards returned to that which they had been forbidden, and conspired together for sin and wrong doing and disobedience to the Messenger (Muhammad SAW ). And when they come to you, they greet you with a greeting wherewith Allah greets you not, and say within themselves: "Why should Allah punish us not for what we say?" Hell will be sufficient for them, they will burn therein, and worst indeed is that destination!
O you who believe! When you hold secret counsel, do it not for sin and wrong-doing, and disobedience towards the Messenger (Muhammad SAW) but do it for Al-Birr (righteousness) and Taqwa (virtues and piety); and fear Allah unto Whom you shall be gathered.
Secret counsels (conspiracies) are only from Shaitan (Satan), in order that he may cause grief to the believers. But he cannot harm them in the least, except as Allah permits, and in Allah let the believers put their trust.
O you who believe! When you are told to make room in the assemblies, (spread out and) make room. Allah will give you (ample) room (from His Mercy). And when you are told to rise up [for prayers, Jihad (holy fighting in Allah's Cause), or for any other good deed], rise up. Allah will exalt in degree those of you who believe, and those who have been granted knowledge. And Allah is Well-Acquainted with what you do.
O you who believe! When you (want to) consult the Messenger (Muhammad SAW) in private, spend something in charity before your private consultation. That will be better and purer for you. But if you find not (the means for it), then verily, Allah is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Are you afraid of spending in charity before your private consultation (with him)? If then you do it not, and Allah has forgiven you, then (at least) perform As-Salat (Iqamat-as-Salat) and give Zakat and obey Allah (i.e. do all what Allah and His Prophet SAW order you to do). And Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
Have you (O Muhammad SAW) not seen those (hypocrites) who take for friends a people upon whom is the Wrath of Allah (i.e. Jews)? They are neither of you (Muslims) nor of them (Jews), and they swear to a lie while they know.
Allah has prepared for them a severe torment. Evil indeed is that which they used to do.
They have made their oaths a screen (for their evil actions). Thus they hinder (men) from the Path of Allah, so they shall have a humiliating torment.
Their children and their wealth will avail them nothing against Allah. They will be (the) dwellers of the Fire, to dwell therein forever.
On the Day when Allah will resurrect them all together (for their account), then they will swear to Him as they swear to you (O Muslims). And they think that they have something (to stand upon). Verily, they are liars!
Shaitan (Satan) has overtaken them. So he has made them forget the remembrance of Allah. They are the party of Shaitan (Satan). Verily, it is the party of Shaitan (Satan) that will be the losers!
Those who oppose Allah and His Messenger (Muhammad SAW), they will be among the lowest (most humiliated).
Allah has decreed: "Verily! It is I and My Messengers who shall be the victorious." Verily, Allah is All-Powerful, All-Mighty.
You (O Muhammad SAW) will not find any people who believe in Allah and the Last Day, making friendship with those who oppose Allah and His Messenger (Muhammad SAW ), even though they were their fathers, or their sons, or their brothers, or their kindred (people). For such He has written Faith in their hearts, and strengthened them with Ruh (proofs, light and true guidance) from Himself. And We will admit them to Gardens (Paradise) under which rivers flow, to dwell therein (forever). Allah is pleased with them, and they with Him. They are the Party of Allah. Verily, it is the Party of Allah that will be the successful.
Whatsoever is in the heavens and whatsoever is on the earth glorifies Allah. And He is the All-Mighty, the All-Wise.
He it is Who drove out the disbelievers among the people of the Scripture (i.e. the Jews of the tribe of Bani An-Nadir) from their homes at the first gathering. You did not think that they would get out. And they thought that their fortresses would defend them from Allah! But Allah's (Torment) reached them from a place whereof they expected it not, and He cast terror into their hearts, so that they destroyed their own dwellings with their own hands and the hands of the believers. Then take admonition, O you with eyes (to see).
And had it not been that Allah had decreed exile for them, He would certainly have punished them in this world, and in the Hereafter theirs shall be the torment of the Fire.
That is because they opposed Allah and His Messenger (Muhammad SAW). And whosoever opposes Allah, then verily, Allah is Severe in punishment.
What you (O Muslims) cut down of the palm-trees (of the enemy), or you left them standing on their stems, it was by Leave of Allah, and in order that He might disgrace the Fasiqun (rebellious, disobedient to Allah).
And what Allah gave as booty (Fai') to His Messenger (Muhammad SAW) from them, for which you made no expedition with either cavalry or camelry. But Allah gives power to His Messengers over whomsoever He wills. And Allah is Able to do all things.
What Allah gave as booty (Fai') to His Messenger (Muhammad SAW) from the people of the townships, - it is for Allah, His Messenger (Muhammad SAW), the kindred (of Messenger Muhammad SAW), the orphans, Al-Masakin (the poor), and the wayfarer, in order that it may not become a fortune used by the rich among you. And whatsoever the Messenger (Muhammad SAW) gives you, take it, and whatsoever he forbids you, abstain (from it), and fear Allah. Verily, Allah is Severe in punishment.
(And there is also a share in this booty) for the poor emigrants, who were expelled from their homes and their property, seeking Bounties from Allah and to please Him. And helping Allah (i.e. helping His religion) and His Messenger (Muhammad SAW). Such are indeed the truthful (to what they say);-
And those who, before them, had homes (in Al-Madinah) and had adopted the Faith, love those who emigrate to them, and have no jealousy in their breasts for that which they have been given (from the booty of Bani An-Nadir), and give them (emigrants) preference over themselves, even though they were in need of that. And whosoever is saved from his own covetousness, such are they who will be the successful.
And those who came after them say: "Our Lord! Forgive us and our brethren who have preceded us in Faith, and put not in our hearts any hatred against those who have believed. Our Lord! You are indeed full of kindness, Most Merciful.
Have you (O Muhammad SAW) not observed the hypocrites who say to their friends among the people of the Scripture who disbelieve: "(By Allah) If you are expelled, we (too) indeed will go out with you, and we shall never obey any one against you, and if you are attacked (in fight), we shall indeed help you." But Allah is Witness, that they verily, are liars.
Surely, if they (the Jews) are expelled, never will they (hypocrites) go out with them, and if they are attacked, they will never help them. And if they do help them, they (hypocrites) will turn their backs, so they will not be victorious.
Verily, you (believers in the Oneness of Allah - Islamic Monotheism) are more awful as a fear in their (Jews of Bani An-Nadir) breasts than Allah. That is because they are a people who comprehend not (the Majesty and Power of Allah).
They fight not against you even together, except in fortified townships, or from behind walls. Their enmity among themselves is very great. You would think they were united, but their hearts are divided, that is because they are a people who understand not.
They are like their immediate predecessors (the Jews of Bani Qainuqa', who suffered), they tasted the evil result of their conduct, and (in the Hereafter, there is) for them a painful torment;-
(Their allies deceived them) like Shaitan (Satan), when he says to man: "Disbelieve in Allah." But when (man) disbelieves in Allah, Shaitan (Satan) says: "I am free of you, I fear Allah, the Lord of the 'Alamin (mankind, jinns and all that exists)!"
So the end of both will be that they will be in the Fire, abiding therein. Such is the recompense of the Zalimun (i.e. polytheists, wrong-doers, disbelievers in Allah and in His Oneness, etc.).
O you who believe! Fear Allah and keep your duty to Him. And let every person look to what he has sent forth for the morrow, and fear Allah. Verily, Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
And be not like those who forgot Allah (i.e. became disobedient to Allah) and He caused them to forget their ownselves, (let them to forget to do righteous deeds). Those are the Fasiqun (rebellious, disobedient to Allah).
Not equal are the dwellers of the Fire and the dwellers of the Paradise. It is the dwellers of Paradise that will be successful.
Had We sent down this Qur'an on a mountain, you would surely have seen it humbling itself and rending asunder by the fear of Allah. Such are the parables which We put forward to mankind that they may reflect.
He is Allah, than Whom there is La ilaha illa Huwa (none has the right to be worshipped but He) the All-Knower of the unseen and the seen (open). He is the Most Beneficent, the Most Merciful.
He is Allah than Whom there is La ilaha illa Huwa (none has the right to be worshipped but He) the King, the Holy, the One Free from all defects, the Giver of security, the Watcher over His creatures, the All-Mighty, the Compeller, the Supreme. Glory be to Allah! (High is He) above all that they associate as partners with Him.
He is Allah, the Creator, the Inventor of all things, the Bestower of forms. To Him belong the Best Names. All that is in the heavens and the earth glorify Him. And He is the All-Mighty, the All-Wise.
O you who believe! Take not My enemies and your enemies (i.e. disbelievers and polytheists, etc.) as friends, showing affection towards them, while they have disbelieved in what has come to you of the truth (i.e. Islamic Monotheism, this Qur'an, and Muhammad SAW), and have driven out the Messenger (Muhammad SAW) and yourselves (from your homeland) because you believe in Allah your Lord! If you have come forth to strive in My Cause and to seek My Good Pleasure, (then take not these disbelievers and polytheists, etc., as your friends). You show friendship to them in secret, while I am All-Aware of what you conceal and what you reveal. And whosoever of you (Muslims) does that, then indeed he has gone (far) astray, (away) from the Straight Path.
Should they gain the upper hand over you, they would behave to you as enemies, and stretch forth their hands and their tongues against you with evil, and they desire that you should disbelieve.
Neither your relatives nor your children will benefit you on the Day of Resurrection (against Allah). He will judge between you. And Allah is the All-Seer of what you do.
Indeed there has been an excellent example for you in Ibrahim (Abraham) and those with him, when they said to their people: "Verily, we are free from you and whatever you worship besides Allah, we have rejected you, and there has started between us and you, hostility and hatred for ever, until you believe in Allah Alone," except the saying of Ibrahim (Abraham) to his father: "Verily, I will ask for forgiveness (from Allah) for you, but I have no power to do anything for you before Allah. "Our Lord! In You (Alone) we put our trust, and to You (Alone) we turn in repentance, and to You (Alone) is (our) final Return,
"Our Lord! Make us not a trial for the disbelievers, and forgive us, Our Lord! Verily, You, only You are the All-Mighty, the All-Wise."
Certainly, there has been in them an excellent example for you to follow, for those who look forward to (the Meeting with) Allah (for the reward from Him) and the Last Day. And whosoever turn away, then verily, Allah is Rich (Free of all wants), Worthy of all Praise.
Perhaps Allah will make friendship between you and those whom you hold as enemies. And Allah has power (over all things), and Allah is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Allah does not forbid you to deal justly and kindly with those who fought not against you on account of religion and did not drive you out of your homes. Verily, Allah loves those who deal with equity.
It is only as regards those who fought against you on account of religion, and have driven you out of your homes, and helped to drive you out, that Allah forbids you to befriend them. And whosoever will befriend them, then such are the Zalimun (wrong-doers those who disobey Allah).
O you who believe! When believing women come to you as emigrants, examine them, Allah knows best as to their Faith, then if you ascertain that they are true believers, send them not back to the disbelievers, they are not lawful (wives) for the disbelievers nor are the disbelievers lawful (husbands) for them. But give the disbelievers that (amount of money) which they have spent [as their Mahr] to them. And there will be no sin on you to marry them if you have paid their Mahr to them. Likewise hold not the disbelieving women as wives, and ask for (the return of) that which you have spent (as Mahr) and let them (the disbelievers, etc.) ask back for that which they have spent. That is the Judgement of Allah. He judges between you. And Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
And if any of your wives have gone from you to the disbelievers, and you have an accession (by the coming over of a woman from the other side), then pay to those whose wives have gone, the equivalent of what they had spent (on their Mahr). And fear Allah in Whom you believe.
O Prophet! When believing women come to you to give you the Bai'a (pledge), that they will not associate anything in worship with Allah, that they will not steal, that they will not commit illegal sexual intercourse, that they will not kill their children, that they will not utter slander, intentionally forging falsehood (i.e. by making illegal children belonging to their husbands), and that they will not disobey you in any Ma'ruf (Islamic Monotheism and all that which Islam ordains) then accept their Bai'a (pledge), and ask Allah to forgive them, Verily, Allah is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
O you who believe! Take not as friends the people who incurred the Wrath of Allah (i.e. the Jews). Surely, they have been in despair to receive any good in the Hereafter, just as the disbelievers have been in despair about those (buried) in graves (that they will not be resurrected on the Day of Resurrection).
Whatsoever is in the heavens and whatsoever is on the earth glorifies Allah. And He is the All-Mighty, the All-Wise.
O you who believe! Why do you say that which you do not do?
Most hateful it is with Allah that you say that which you do not do.
Verily, Allah loves those who fight in His Cause in rows (ranks) as if they were a solid structure.
And (remember) when Musa (Moses) said to his people: "O my people! Why do you hurt me while you know certainly that I am the Messenger of Allah to you? So when they turned away (from the Path of Allah), Allah turned their hearts away (from the Right Path). And Allah guides not the people who are Fasiqun (rebellious, disobedient to Allah).
And (remember) when 'Iesa (Jesus), son of Maryam (Mary), said: "O Children of Israel! I am the Messenger of Allah unto you confirming the Taurat [(Torah) which came] before me, and giving glad tidings of a Messenger to come after me, whose name shall be Ahmed. But when he (Ahmed i.e. Muhammad SAW) came to them with clear proofs, they said: "This is plain magic."
And who does more wrong than the one who invents a lie against Allah, while he is being invited to Islam? And Allah guides not the people who are Zalimun (polytheists, wrong-doers and disbelievers) folk.
They intend to put out the Light of Allah (i.e. the religion of Islam, this Qur'an, and Prophet Muhammad SAW) with their mouths. But Allah will complete His Light even though the disbelievers hate (it).
He it is Who has sent His Messenger (Muhammad SAW) with guidance and the religion of truth (Islamic Monotheism) to make it victorious over all (other) religions even though the Mushrikun (polytheists, pagans, idolaters, and disbelievers in the Oneness of Allah and in His Messenger Muhammed SAW) hate (it).
O You who believe! Shall I guide you to a commerce that will save you from a painful torment.
That you believe in Allah and His Messenger (Muhammad SAW), and that you strive hard and fight in the Cause of Allah with your wealth and your lives, that will be better for you, if you but know!
(If you do so) He will forgive you your sins, and admit you into Gardens under which rivers flow, and pleasant dwelling in Gardens of 'Adn - Eternity ['Adn (Edn) Paradise], that is indeed the great success.
And also (He will give you) another (blessing) which you love, help from Allah (against your enemies) and a near victory. And give glad tidings (O Muhammad SAW) to the believers.
O you who believe! Be you helpers (in the Cause) of Allah as said 'Iesa (Jesus), son of Maryam (Mary), to Al-Hawarieen (the disciples) : "Who are my helpers (in the Cause) of Allah?" Al-Hawarieen (the disciples) said: "We are Allah's helpers" (i.e. we will strive in His Cause!). Then a group of the Children of Israel believed and a group disbelieved. So We gave power to those who believed against their enemies, and they became the uppermost.
Whatsoever is in the heavens and whatsoever is on the earth glorifies Allah, the King (of everything), the Holy, the All-Mighty, the All-Wise.
He it is Who sent among the unlettered ones a Messenger (Muhammad SAW) from among themselves, reciting to them His Verses, purifying them (from the filth of disbelief and polytheism), and teaching them the Book (this Qur'an, Islamic laws and Islamic jurisprudence) and Al-Hikmah (As-Sunnah: legal ways, orders, acts of worship, etc. of Prophet Muhammad SAW). And verily, they had been before in mainfest error;
And He has sent him (Prophet Muhammad SAW) also to others among them (Muslims) who have not yet joined them (but they will come). And He (Allah) is the All-Mighty, the All-Wise.
That is the Grace of Allah, which He bestows on whom He wills. And Allah is the Owner of Mighty Grace.
The likeness of those who were entrusted with the (obligation of the) Taurat (Torah) (i.e. to obey its commandments and to practise its legal laws), but who subsequently failed in those (obligations), is as the likeness of a donkey who carries huge burdens of books (but understands nothing from them). How bad is the example (or the likeness) of people who deny the Ayat (proofs, evidences, verses, signs, revelations, etc.) of Allah. And Allah guides not the people who are Zalimun (polytheists, wrong-doers, disbelievers, etc.).
Say (O Muhammad SAW): "O you Jews! If you pretend that you are friends of Allah, to the exclusion of (all) other mankind, then long for death if you are truthful."
But they will never long for it (death), because of what (deeds) their hands have sent before them! And Allah knows well the Zalimun (polytheists, wrong-doers, disbelievers, etc.).
Say (to them): "Verily, the death from which you flee will surely meet you, then you will be sent back to (Allah), the All-Knower of the unseen and the seen, and He will tell you what you used to do."
O you who believe (Muslims)! When the call is proclaimed for the Salat (prayer) on the day of Friday (Jumu'ah prayer), come to the remembrance of Allah [Jumu'ah religious talk (Khutbah) and Salat (prayer)] and leave off business (and every other thing), that is better for you if you did but know!
Then when the (Jumu'ah) Salat (prayer) is finished, you may disperse through the land, and seek the Bounty of Allah (by working, etc.), and remember Allah much, that you may be successful.
And when they see some merchandise or some amusement [beating of Tambur (drum) etc.] they disperse headlong to it, and leave you (Muhammad SAW) standing [while delivering Jumu'ah's religious talk (Khutbah)]. Say "That which Allah has is better than any amusement or merchandise! And Allah is the Best of providers."
When the hypocrites come to you (O Muhammad SAW), they say: "We bear witness that you are indeed the Messenger of Allah." Allah knows that you are indeed His Messenger and Allah bears witness that the hypocrites are liars indeed.
They have made their oaths a screen (for their hypocrisy). Thus they hinder (men) from the Path of Allah. Verily, evil is what they used to do.
That is because they believed, then disbelieved, therefore their hearts are sealed, so they understand not.
And when you look at them, their bodies please you; and when they speak, you listen to their words. They are as blocks of wood propped up. They think that every cry is against them. They are the enemies, so beware of them. May Allah curse them! How are they denying (or deviating from) the Right Path.
And when it is said to them: "Come, so that the Messenger of Allah may ask forgiveness from Allah for you", they turn aside their heads, and you would see them turning away their faces in pride.
It is equal to them whether you (Muhammad SAW) ask forgiveness or ask not forgiveness for them. Verily, Allah guides not the people who are the Fasiqin (rebellious, disobedient to Allah).
They are the ones who say: "Spend not on those who are with Allah's Messenger, until they desert him." And to Allah belong the treasures of the heavens and the earth, but the hypocrites comprehend not.
They (hyprocrites) say: "If we return to Al-Madinah, indeed the more honourable ('Abdullah bin Ubai bin Salul, the chief of hyprocrites at Al-Madinah) will expel therefrom the meaner (i.e. Allah's Messenger SAW)." But honour, power and glory belong to Allah, His Messenger (Muhammad SAW), and to the believers, but the hypocrites know not.
O you who believe! Let not your properties or your children divert you from the remembrance of Allah. And whosoever does that, then they are the losers.
And spend (in charity) of that with which We have provided you, before death comes to one of you and he says: "My Lord! If only You would give me respite for a little while (i.e. return to the worldly life), then I should give Sadaqah (i.e. Zakat) of my wealth, and be among the righteous [i.e. perform Hajj (pilgrimage to Makkah)].
And Allah grants respite to none when his appointed time (death) comes. And Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
Whatsoever is in the heavens and whatsoever is on the earth glorifies Allah. His is the dominion, and to Him belong all the praises and thanks, and He is Able to do all things.
He it is Who created you, then some of you are disbelievers and some of you are believers. And Allah is All-Seer of what you do.
He has created the heavens and the earth with truth, and He shaped you and made good your shapes, and to Him is the final Return.
He knows what is in the heavens and on earth, and He knows what you conceal and what you reveal. And Allah is the All-Knower of what is in the breasts (of men).
Has not the news reached you of those who disbelieved aforetime? And so they tasted the evil result of their disbelief, and theirs will be a painful torment.
That was because there came to them their Messengers with clear proofs (signs), but they said: "Shall mere men guide us?" So they disbelieved and turned away (from the truth), and Allah was not in need (of them). And Allah is Rich (Free of all wants), Worthy of all praise.
The disbelievers pretend that they will never be resurrected (for the Account). Say (O Muhammad SAW): "Yes! By my Lord, you will certainly be resurrected, then you will be informed of (and recompensed for) what you did, and that is easy for Allah.
Therefore, believe in Allah and His Messenger (Muhammad SAW), and in the Light (this Qur'an) which We have sent down. And Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
(And remember) the Day when He will gather you (all) on the Day of Gathering, that will be the Day of mutual loss and gain (i.e. loss for the disbelievers as they will enter the Hell-fire and gain for the believers as they will enter Paradise). And whosoever believes in Allah and performs righteous good deeds, He will remit from him his sins, and will admit him to Gardens under which rivers flow (Paradise) to dwell therein forever, that will be the great success.
But those who disbelieved (in the Oneness of Allah - Islamic Monotheism) and denied Our Ayat (proofs, evidences, verses, lessons, signs, revelations, etc.), they will be the dwellers of the Fire, to dwell therein forever. And worst indeed is that destination.
No calamity befalls, but with the Leave [i.e. decision and Qadar (Divine Preordainments)] of Allah, and whosoever believes in Allah, He guides his heart [to the true Faith with certainty, i.e. what has befallen him was already written for him by Allah from the Qadar (Divine Preordainments)], and Allah is the All-Knower of everything.
Obey Allah, and obey the Messenger (Muhammad SAW), but if you turn away, then the duty of Our Messenger is only to convey (the Message) clearly.
Allah! La ilaha illa Huwa (none has the right to be worshipped but He), and in Allah (Alone), therefore, let the believers put their trust.
O you who believe! Verily, among your wives and your children there are enemies for you (i.e. may stop you from the obedience of Allah), therefore beware of them! But if you pardon (them) and overlook, and forgive (their faults), then verily, Allah is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Your wealth and your children are only a trial, whereas Allah! With Him is a great reward (Paradise).
So keep your duty to Allah and fear Him as much as you can; listen and obey; and spend in charity, that is better for yourselves. And whosoever is saved from his own covetousness, then they are the successful ones.
If you lend to Allah a goodly loan (i.e. spend in Allah's Cause) He will double it for you, and will forgive you. And Allah is Most Ready to appreciate and to reward, Most Forbearing,
All-Knower of the unseen and seen, the All-Mighty, the All-Wise.
O Prophet (SAW)! When you divorce women, divorce them at their 'Iddah (prescribed periods), and count (accurately) their 'Iddah (periods ). And fear Allah your Lord (O Muslims), and turn them not out of their (husband's) homes, nor shall they (themselves) leave, except in case they are guilty of some open illegal sexual intercourse. And those are the set limits of Allah. And whosoever transgresses the set limits of Allah, then indeed he has wronged himself. You (the one who divorces his wife) know not, it may be that Allah will afterward bring some new thing to pass (i.e. to return her back to you if that was the first or second divorce).
Then when they are about to fulfil their term appointed, either take them back in a good manner or part with them in a good manner. And take for witness two just persons from among you (Muslims). And establish the witness for Allah. That will be an admonition given to him who believes in Allah and the Last Day. And whosoever fears Allah and keeps his duty to Him, He will make a way for him to get out (from every difficulty).
And He will provide him from (sources) he never could imagine. And whosoever puts his trust in Allah, then He will suffice him. Verily, Allah will accomplish his purpose. Indeed Allah has set a measure for all things.
And those of your women as have passed the age of monthly courses, for them the 'Iddah (prescribed period), if you have doubts (about their periods), is three months, and for those who have no courses [(i.e. they are still immature) their 'Iddah (prescribed period) is three months likewise, except in case of death]. And for those who are pregnant (whether they are divorced or their husbands are dead), their 'Iddah (prescribed period) is until they deliver (their burdens), and whosoever fears Allah and keeps his duty to Him, He will make his matter easy for him.
That is the Command of Allah, which He has sent down to you, and whosoever fears Allah and keeps his duty to Him, He will remit his sins from him, and will enlarge his reward.
Lodge them (the divorced women) where you dwell, according to your means, and do not treat them in such a harmful way that they be obliged to leave. And if they are pregnant, then spend on them till they deliver. Then if they give suck to the children for you, give them their due payment, and let each of you accept the advice of the other in a just way. But if you make difficulties for one another, then some other woman may give suck for him (the father of the child).
Let the rich man spend according to his means, and the man whose resources are restricted, let him spend according to what Allah has given him. Allah puts no burden on any person beyond what He has given him. Allah will grant after hardship, ease.
And many a town (population) revolted against the Command of its Lord and His Messengers, and We called it to a severe account (i.e. torment in this worldly life), and shall punish it with a horrible torment (in Hell, in the Hereafter).
So it tasted the evil result of its disbelief, and the consequence of its disbelief was loss (destruction in this life and an eternal punishment in the Hereafter).
Allah has prepared for them a severe torment. So fear Allah and keep your duty to Him, O men of understanding who have believed! - Allah has indeed sent down to you a Reminder (this Qur'an).
(And has also sent to you) a Messenger (Muhammad SAW), who recites to you the Verses of Allah (the Qur'an) containing clear explanations, that He may take out, those who believe and do righteous good deeds from the darkness (of polytheism and disbelief) to the light (of Monotheism and true Faith). And whosoever believes in Allah and performs righteous good deeds, He will admit him into Gardens under which rivers flow (Paradise), to dwell therein forever. Allah has indeed granted for him an excellent provision.
It is Allah Who has created seven heavens and of the earth the like thereof (i.e. seven). His Command descends between them (heavens and earth), that you may know that Allah has power over all things, and that Allah surrounds (comprehends) all things in (His) Knowledge.
O Prophet! Why do you ban (for yourself) that which Allah has made lawful to you, seeking to please your wives? And Allah is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Allah has already ordained for you (O men), the dissolution of your oaths. And Allah is your Maula (Lord, or Master, or Protector, etc.) and He is the All-Knower, the All-Wise.
And (remember) when the Prophet (SAW) disclosed a matter in confidence to one of his wives (Hafsah), so when she told it (to another i.e. 'Aishah), and Allah made it known to him, he informed part thereof and left a part. Then when he told her (Hafsah) thereof, she said: "Who told you this?" He said: "The All-Knower, the All-Aware (Allah) has told me".
If you two (wives of the Prophet SAW, namely 'Aishah and Hafsah radhiallahu'anhu) turn in repentance to Allah, (it will be better for you), your hearts are indeed so inclined (to oppose what the Prophet SAW likes), but if you help one another against him (Muhammad SAW), then verily, Allah is his Maula (Lord, or Master, or Protector, etc.), and Jibrael (Gabriel), and the righteous among the believers, and furthermore, the angels are his helpers.
It may be if he divorced you (all) that his Lord will give him instead of you, wives better than you, Muslims (who submit to Allah), believers, obedient to Allah, turning to Allah in repentance, worshipping Allah sincerely, fasting or emigrants (for Allah's sake), previously married and virgins.
O you who believe! Ward off from yourselves and your families a Fire (Hell) whose fuel is men and stones, over which are (appointed) angels stern (and) severe, who disobey not, (from executing) the Commands they receive from Allah, but do that which they are commanded.
(It will be said in the Hereafter) O you who disbelieve (in the Oneness of Allah - Islamic Monotheism)! Make no excuses this Day! You are being requited only for what you used to do.
O you who believe! Turn to Allah with sincere repentance! It may be that your Lord will remit from you your sins, and admit you into Gardens under which rivers flow (Paradise) the Day that Allah will not disgrace the Prophet (Muhammad SAW) and those who believe with him, their Light will run forward before them and with (their Records Books of deeds) in their right hands they will say: "Our Lord! Keep perfect our Light for us [and do not put it off till we cross over the Sirat (a slippery bridge over the Hell) safely] and grant us forgiveness. Verily, You are Able to do all things."
O Prophet (Muhammad SAW)! Strive hard against the disbelievers and the hypocrites, and be severe against them, their abode will be Hell, and worst indeed is that destination.
Allah sets forth an example for those who disbelieve, the wife of Nuh (Noah) and the wife of Lout (Lot). They were under two of our righteous slaves, but they both betrayed their (husbands by rejecting their doctrine) so they [Nuh (Noah) and Lout (Lot)] benefited them (their respective wives) not, against Allah, and it was said: "Enter the Fire along with those who enter!"
And Allah has set forth an example for those who believe, the wife of Fir'aun (Pharaoh), when she said: "My Lord! Build for me a home with You in Paradise, and save me from Fir'aun (Pharaoh) and his work, and save me from the people who are Zalimun (polytheists, wrong-doers and disbelievers in Allah).
And Maryam (Mary), the daughter of 'Imran who guarded her chastity; and We breathed into (the sleeve of her shirt or her garment) through Our Ruh [i.e. Jibrael (Gabriel)], and she testified to the truth of the Words of her Lord [i.e. believed in the Words of Allah: "Be!" and he was; that is 'Iesa (Jesus) - son of Maryam (Mary); as a Messenger of Allah], and (also believed in) His Scriptures, and she was of the Qanitin (i.e. obedient to Allah).
Blessed is He in Whose Hand is the dominion, and He is Able to do all things.
Who has created death and life, that He may test you which of you is best in deed. And He is the All-Mighty, the Oft-Forgiving;
Who has created the seven heavens one above another, you can see no fault in the creations of the Most Beneficent. Then look again: "Can you see any rifts?"
Then look again and yet again, your sight will return to you in a state of humiliation and worn out.
And indeed We have adorned the nearest heaven with lamps, and We have made such lamps (as) missiles to drive away the Shayatin (devils), and have prepared for them the torment of the blazing Fire.
And for those who disbelieve in their Lord (Allah) is the torment of Hell, and worst indeed is that destination.
When they are cast therein, they will hear the (terrible) drawing in of its breath as it blazes forth.
It almost bursts up with fury. Every time a group is cast therein, its keeper will ask: "Did no warner come to you?"
They will say: "Yes indeed; a warner did come to us, but we belied him and said: 'Allah never sent down anything (of revelation), you are only in great error.'"
And they will say: "Had we but listened or used our intelligence, we would not have been among the dwellers of the blazing Fire!"
Then they will confess their sin. So, away with the dwellers of the blazing Fire.
Verily! Those who fear their Lord unseen (i.e. they do not see Him, nor His Punishment in the Hereafter, etc.), theirs will be forgiveness and a great reward (i.e. Paradise).
And whether you keep your talk secret or disclose it, verily, He is the All-Knower of what is in the breasts (of men).
Should not He Who has created know? And He is the Most Kind and Courteous (to His slaves) All-Aware (of everything).
He it is, Who has made the earth subservient to you (i.e. easy for you to walk, to live and to do agriculture on it, etc.), so walk in the path thereof and eat of His provision, and to Him will be the Resurrection.
Do you feel secure that He, Who is over the heaven (Allah), will not cause the earth to sink with you, then behold it shakes (as in an earthquake)?
Or do you feel secure that He, Who is over the heaven (Allah), will not send against you a violent whirlwind? Then you shall know how (terrible) has been My Warning?
And indeed those before them belied (the Messengers of Allah), then how terrible was My denial (punishment)?
Do they not see the birds above them, spreading out their wings and folding them in? None upholds them except the Most Beneficent (Allah). Verily, He is the All-Seer of everything.
Who is he besides the Most Beneficent that can be an army to you to help you? The disbelievers are in nothing but delusion.
Who is he that can provide for you if He should withhold His provision? Nay, but they continue to be in pride, and (they) flee (from the truth).
Is he who walks without seeing on his face, more rightly guided, or he who (sees and) walks on a Straight Way (i.e. Islamic Monotheism).
Say it is He Who has created you, and endowed you with hearing (ears), seeing (eyes), and hearts. Little thanks you give.
Say: "It is He Who has created you from the earth, and to Him shall you be gathered (in the Hereafter)."
They say: "When will this promise (i.e. the Day of Resurrection) come to pass? if you are telling the truth."
Say (O Muhammad SAW): "The knowledge (of its exact time) is with Allah only, and I am only a plain warner."
But when they will see it (the torment on the Day of Resurrection) approaching, the faces of those who disbelieve will be different (black, sad, and in grieve), and it will be said (to them): "This is (the promise) which you were calling for!"
Say (O Muhammad SAW): "Tell me! If Allah destroys me, and those with me, or He bestows His Mercy on us, - who can save the disbelievers from a painful torment?"
Say: "He is the Most Beneficent (Allah), in Him we believe, and in Him we put our trust. So you will come to know who is it that is in manifest error."
Say (O Muhammad SAW): "Tell me! If (all) your water were to be sunk away, who then can supply you with flowing (spring) water?"
Nun. [These letters (Nun, etc.) are one of the miracles of the Qur'an, and none but Allah (Alone) knows their meanings]. By the pen and what the (angels) write (in the Records of men).
You (O Muhammad SAW) are not, by the Grace of your Lord, a madman.
And verily, for you (O Muhammad SAW) will be an endless reward.
And verily, you (O Muhammad SAW) are on an exalted standard of character.
You will see, and they will see,
Which of you is afflicted with madness.
Verily, your Lord knows better, who (among men) has gone astray from His Path, and He knows better those who are guided.
So (O Muhammad SAW) obey not the deniers [(of Islamic Monotheism those who belie the Verses of Allah), the Oneness of Allah, and the Messenger of Allah (Muhammad SAW), etc.]
They wish that you should compromise (in religion out of courtesy) with them, so they (too) would compromise with you.
And obey not everyone who swears much, and is considered worthless,
A slanderer, going about with calumnies,
Hinderer of the good, transgressor, sinful,
Cruel, after all that base-born (of illegitimate birth),
(He was so) because he had wealth and children.
When Our Verses (of the Qur'an) are recited to him, he says: "Tales of the men of old!"
We shall brand him over the nose!
Verily, We have tried them as We tried the people of the garden, when they swore to pluck the fruits of the (garden) in the morning,
Without saying: Insha' Allah (If Allah will).
Then there passed by on the (garden) something (fire) from your Lord at night and burnt it while they were asleep.
So the (garden) became black by the morning, like a pitch dark night (in complete ruins).
Then they called out one to another as soon as the morning broke,
Saying: "Go to your tilth in the morning, if you would pluck the fruits."
So they departed, conversing in secret low tones (saying),
No Miskin (poor man) shall enter upon you into it today.
And they went in the morning with strong intention, thinking that they have power (to prevent the poor taking anything of the fruits therefrom).
But when they saw the (garden), they said: "Verily, we have gone astray,"
(Then they said): "Nay! Indeed we are deprived of (the fruits)!"
The best among them said: "Did I not tell you: why do you not say: Insha' Allah (If Allah will)."
They said: "Glory to Our Lord! Verily, we have been Zalimun (wrong-doers, etc.)."
Then they turned, one against another, in blaming.
They said: "Woe to us! Verily, we were Taghun (transgressors and disobedient, etc.)
We hope that our Lord will give us in exchange a better (garden) than this. Truly, we turn to our Lord (wishing for good that He may forgive our sins, and reward us in the Hereafter)."
Such is the punishment (in this life), but truly, the punishment of the Hereafter is greater, if they but knew.
Verily, for the Muttaqun (pious and righteous persons - see V.2:2) are Gardens of delight (Paradise) with their Lord.
Shall We then treat the (submitting) Muslims like the Mujrimun (criminals, polytheists and disbelievers, etc.)?
What is the matter with you? How judge you?
Or have you a Book through which you learn.
That you shall have all that you choose?
Or you have oaths from Us, reaching to the Day of Resurrection that yours will be what you judge.
Ask them, which of them will stand surety for that!
Or have they "partners"? Then let them bring their "partners" if they are truthful!
(Remember) the Day when the Shin shall be laid bare (i.e. the Day of Resurrection) and they shall be called to prostrate (to Allah), but they (hypocrites) shall not be able to do so,
Their eyes will be cast down, ignominy will cover them; they used to be called to prostrate (offer prayers), while they were healthy and good (in the life of the world, but they did not).
Then leave Me Alone with such as belie this Qur'an. We shall punish them gradually from directions they perceive not.
And I will grant them a respite. Verily, My Plan is strong.
Or is it that you (O Muhammad SAW) ask them a wage, so that they are heavily burdened with debt?
Or that the Ghaib (unseen here in this Verse it means Al-Lauh Al-Mahfuz) is in their hands, so that they can write it down?
So wait with patience for the Decision of your Lord, and be not like the Companion of the Fish, when he cried out (to Us) while he was in deep sorrow. (See the Qur'an, Verse 21:87).
Had not a Grace from his Lord reached him, he would indeed have been (left in the stomach of the fish, but We forgave him), so he was cast off on the naked shore, while he was to be blamed.
But his Lord chose him and made him of the righteous.
And verily, those who disbelieve would almost make you slip with their eyes through hatredness when they hear the Reminder (the Qur'an), and they say: "Verily, he (Muhammad SAW) is a madman!"
But it is nothing else than a Reminder to all the 'Alamin (mankind, jinns and all that exists).
The Reality (i.e. the Day of Resurrection)!
What is the Reality?
And what will make you know what the Reality is?
Thamud and 'Ad people denied the Qari'ah [the striking Hour (of Judgement)]!
As for Thamud, they were destroyed by the awful cry!
And as for 'Ad, they were destroyed by a furious violent wind;
Which Allah imposed on them for seven nights and eight days in succession, so that you could see men lying overthrown (destroyed), as if they were hollow trunks of date-palms!
Do you see any remnants of them?
And Fir'aun (Pharaoh), and those before him, and the cities overthrown [the towns of the people of [Lout (Lot)] committed sin,
And they disobeyed their Lord's Messenger, so He punished them with a strong punishment.
Verily! When the water rose beyond its limits [Nuh's (Noah) Flood], We carried you (mankind) in the floating [ship that was constructed by Nuh (Noah)].
That We might make it a remembrance for you, and the keen ear (person) may (hear and) understand it.
Then when the Trumpet will be blown with one blowing (the first one),
And the earth and the mountains shall be removed from their places, and crushed with a single crushing,
Then on that Day shall the (Great) Event befall,
And the heaven will split asunder, for that Day it (the heaven will be frail (weak), and torn up,
And the angels will be on its sides, and eight angels will, that Day, bear the Throne of your Lord above them.
That Day shall you be brought to Judgement, not a secret of you will be hidden.
Then as for him who will be given his Record in his right hand will say: "Take, read my Record!
"Surely, I did believe that I shall meet my Account!"
So he shall be in a life, well-pleasing.
In a lofty Paradise,
The fruits in bunches whereof will be low and near at hand.
Eat and drink at ease for that which you have sent on before you in days past!
But as for him who will be given his Record in his left hand, will say: "I wish that I had not been given my Record!
"And that I had never known, how my Account is?
"I wish, would that it had been my end (death)!
"My wealth has not availed me,
"My power and arguments (to defend myself) have gone from me!"
(It will be said): "Seize him and fetter him,
Then throw him in the blazing Fire.
"Then fasten him with a chain whereof the length is seventy cubits!"
Verily, He used not to believe in Allah, the Most Great,
And urged not on the feeding of Al-Miskin (the poor),
So no friend has he here this Day,
Nor any food except filth from the washing of wounds,
None will eat except the Khati'un (sinners, disbelievers, polytheists, etc.).
So I swear by whatsoever you see,
And by whatsoever you see not,
That this is verily the word of an honoured Messenger [i.e. Jibrael (Gabriel) or Muhammad SAW which he has brought from Allah].
It is not the word of a poet, little is that you believe!
Nor is it the word of a soothsayer (or a foreteller), little is that you remember!
This is the Revelation sent down from the Lord of the 'Alamin (mankind, jinns and all that exists).
And if he (Muhammad SAW) had forged a false saying concerning Us (Allah swt),
We surely should have seized him by his right hand (or with power and might),
And then certainly should have cut off his life artery (Aorta),
And none of you could withhold Us from (punishing) him.
And verily, this Qur'an is a Reminder for the Muttaqun (pious - see V.2:2).
And verily, We know that there are some among you that belie (this Qur'an).
And indeed it (this Qur'an) will be an anguish for the disbelievers (on the Day of Resurrection).
And Verily, it (this Qur'an) is an absolute truth with certainty.
So glorify the Name of your Lord, the Most Great.
A questioner asked concerning a torment about to befall
Upon the disbelievers, which none can avert,
From Allah, the Lord of the ways of ascent.
The angels and the Ruh [Jibrael (Gabriel)] ascend to Him in a Day the measure whereof is fifty thousand years,
So be patient (O Muhammad SAW ), with a good patience.
Verily! They see it (the torment) afar off,
But We see it (quite) near.
The Day that the sky will be like the boiling filth of oil, (or molten copper or silver or lead, etc.).
And the mountains will be like flakes of wool,
And no friend will ask of a friend,
Though they shall be made to see one another [(i.e. on the Day of Resurrection), there will be none but see his father, children and relatives, but he will neither speak to them nor will ask them for any help)], - the Mujrim, (criminal, sinner, disbeliever, etc.) would desire to ransom himself from the punishment of that Day by his children.
And his wife and his brother,
And his kindred who sheltered him,
And all that are in the earth, so that it might save him.
By no means! Verily, it will be the Fire of Hell!
Taking away (burning completely) the head skin!
Calling: "[O Kafir (O disbeliever in Allah, His angels, His Book, His Messengers, Day of Resurrection and in Al-Qadar (Divine Preordainments), O Mushrik (O polytheist, disbeliever in the Oneness of Allah)] (all) such as turn their backs and turn away their faces (from Faith) [picking and swallowing them up from that great gathering of mankind (on the Day of Resurrection) just as a bird picks up a food-grain from the earth with its beak and swallows it up]
And collect (wealth) and hide it (from spending it in the Cause of Allah).
Verily, man (disbeliever) was created very impatient;
Irritable (discontented) when evil touches him;
And niggardly when good touches him;-
Except those devoted to Salat (prayers)
Those who remain constant in their Salat (prayers);
And those in whose wealth there is a known right,
For the beggar who asks, and for the unlucky who has lost his property and wealth, (and his means of living has been straitened);
And those who believe in the Day of Recompense,
And those who fear the torment of their Lord,
Verily! The torment of their Lord is that before which none can feel secure,
And those who guard their chastity (i.e. private parts from illegal sexual acts).
Except with their wives and the (women slaves and captives) whom their right hands possess, for (then) they are not to be blamed,
But whosoever seeks beyond that, then it is those who are trespassers.
And those who keep their trusts and covenants;
And those who stand firm in their testimonies;
And those who guard their Salat (prayers) well,
Such shall dwell in the Gardens (i.e. Paradise) honoured.
So what is the matter with those who disbelieve that they hasten to listen from you (O Muhammad SAW), in order to belie you and to mock at you, and at Allah's Book (this Qur'an).
(Sitting) in groups on the right and on the left (of you, O Muhammad SAW)?
Does every man of them hope to enter the Paradise of delight?
No, that is not like that! Verily, We have created them out of that which they know!
So I swear by the Lord of all [the three hundred and sixty (360)] points of sunrise and sunset in the east and the west that surely We are Able
To replace them by (others) better than them; and We are not to be outrun.
So leave them to plunge in vain talk and play about, until they meet their Day which they are promised.
The Day when they will come out of the graves quickly as racing to a goal,
With their eyes lowered in fear and humility, ignominy covering them (all over)! That is the Day which they were promised!
Verily, We sent Nuh (Noah) to his people (Saying): "Warn your people before there comes to them a painful torment."
He said: "O my people! Verily, I am a plain warner to you,
"That you should worship Allah (Alone), be dutiful to Him, and obey me,
"He (Allah) will forgive you of your sins and respite you to an appointed term. Verily, the term of Allah when it comes, cannot be delayed, if you but knew."
He said: "O my Lord! Verily, I have called my people night and day (i.e. secretly and openly to accept the doctrine of Islamic Monotheism),
"But all my calling added nothing but to (their) flight (from the truth).
"And verily! Every time I called unto them that You might forgive them, they thrust their fingers into their ears, covered themselves up with their garments, and persisted (in their refusal), and magnified themselves in pride.
"Then verily, I called to them openly (aloud);
"Then verily, I proclaimed to them in public, and I have appealed to them in private,
"I said (to them): 'Ask forgiveness from your Lord; Verily, He is Oft-Forgiving;
'He will send rain to you in abundance;
'And give you increase in wealth and children, and bestow on you gardens and bestow on you rivers.' "
What is the matter with you, [that you fear not Allah (His punishment), and] you hope not for reward (from Allah or you believe not in His Oneness).
While He has created you in (different) stages [i.e. first Nutfah, then 'Alaqah and then Mudghah, see (VV.23:13,14) the Qur'an].
See you not how Allah has created the seven heavens one above another,
And has made the moon a light therein, and made the sun a lamp?
And Allah has brought you forth from the (dust of) earth.
Afterwards He will return you into it (the earth), and bring you forth (again on the Day of Resurrection)?
And Allah has made for you the earth wide spread (an expanse).
That you may go about therein in broad roads.
Nuh (Noah) said: "My Lord! They have disobeyed me, and followed one whose wealth and children give him no increase but only loss.
"And they have plotted a mighty plot.
"And they have said: 'You shall not leave your gods, nor shall you leave Wadd, nor Suwa', nor Yaghuth, nor Ya'uq, nor Nasr (names of the idols);
"And indeed they have led many astray. And (O Allah): 'Grant no increase to the Zalimun (polytheists, wrong-doers, and disbelievers, etc.) save error.' "
Because of their sins they were drowned, then were made to enter the Fire, and they found none to help them instead of Allah.
And Nuh (Noah) said: "My Lord! Leave not one of the disbelievers on the earth!
"If You leave them, they will mislead Your slaves, and they will beget none but wicked disbelievers."
"My Lord! Forgive me, and my parents, and him who enters my home as a believer, and all the believing men and women. And to the Zalimun (polytheists, wrong-doers, and disbelievers, etc.) grant You no increase but destruction!"
Say (O Muhammad SAW): "It has been revealed to me that a group (from three to ten in number) of jinns listened (to this Qur'an). They said: 'Verily! We have heard a wonderful Recital (this Qur'an)!
'It guides to the Right Path, and we have believed therein, and we shall never join (in worship) anything with our Lord (Allah).
'And exalted be the Majesty of our Lord, He has taken neither a wife, nor a son (or offspring or children).
'And that the foolish among us [i.e. Iblis (Satan) or the polytheists amongst the jinns] used to utter against Allah that which was wrong and not right.
'And verily, we thought that men and jinns would not utter a lie against Allah.
'And verily, there were men among mankind who took shelter with the masculine among the jinns, but they (jinns) increased them (mankind) in sin and disbelief.
'And they thought as you thought, that Allah will not send any Messenger (to mankind or jinns).
'And we have sought to reach the heaven; but found it filled with stern guards and flaming fires.
'And verily, we used to sit there in stations, to (steal) a hearing, but any who listens now will find a flaming fire watching him in ambush.
'And we know not whether evil is intended for those on earth, or whether their Lord intends for them a Right Path.
'There are among us some that are righteous, and some the contrary; we are groups each having a different way (religious sect, etc.).
'And we think that we cannot escape (from the punishment of) Allah in the earth, nor can we escape (from the punishment) by flight.
'And indeed when we heard the Guidance (this Qur'an), we believed therein (Islamic Monotheism), and whosoever believes in his Lord shall have no fear, either of a decrease in the reward of his good deeds or an increase in punishment for his sins.
'And of us some are Muslims (who have submitted to Allah, after listening to this Qur'an), and of us some are Al-Qasitun (disbelievers those who have deviated from the Right Path)'. And whosoever has embraced Islam (i.e. has become a Muslim by submitting to Allah), then such have sought the Right Path."
And as for the Qasitun (disbelievers who deviated from the Right Path), they shall be firewood for Hell,
If they (non-Muslims) had believed in Allah, and went on the Right Way (i.e. Islam) We should surely have bestowed on them water (rain) in abundance.
That We might try them thereby. And whosoever turns away from the Reminder of his Lord (i.e. this Qur'an, and practice not its laws and orders), He will cause him to enter in a severe torment (i.e. Hell).
And the mosques are for Allah (Alone), so invoke not anyone along with Allah.
(It has been revealed to me that) When the slave of Allah (Muhammad SAW) stood up invoking (his Lord Allah) in prayer to Him they (the jinns) just made round him a dense crowd as if sticking one over the other (in order to listen to the Prophet's recitation).
Say (O Muhammad SAW): "I invoke only my Lord (Allah Alone), and I associate none as partners along with Him."
Say: "It is not in my power to cause you harm, or to bring you to the Right Path."
Say (O Muhammad SAW): "None can protect me from Allah's punishment (if I were to disobey Him), nor should I find refuge except in Him.
"(Mine is) but conveyance (of the truth) from Allah and His Messages (of Islamic Monotheism), and whosoever disobeys Allah and His Messenger, then verily, for him is the Fire of Hell, he shall dwell therein forever."
Till, when they see that which they are promised, then they will know who it is that is weaker concerning helpers and less important concerning numbers.
Say (O Muhammad SAW): "I know not whether (the punishment) which you are promised is near or whether my Lord will appoint for it a distant term.
"(He Alone) the All-Knower of the Gha'ib (unseen), and He reveals to none His Gha'ib (unseen)."
Except to a Messenger (from mankind) whom He has chosen (He informs him of unseen as much as He likes), and then He makes a band of watching guards (angels) to march before him and behind him.
[He (Allah) protects them (the Messengers)], till He sees that they (the Messengers) have conveyed the Messages of their Lord (Allah). And He (Allah) surrounds all that which is with them, and He (Allah) keeps count of all things (i.e. He knows the exact number of everything).
O you wrapped in garments (i.e. Prophet Muhammad SAW)!
Stand (to pray) all night, except a little.
Half of it, or a little less than that,
Or a little more; and recite the Qur'an (aloud) in a slow, (pleasant tone and) style.
Verily, We shall send down to you a weighty Word (i.e. obligations, legal laws, etc.).
Verily, the rising by night (for Tahajjud prayer) is very hard and most potent and good for governing (the soul), and most suitable for (understanding) the Word (of Allah).
Verily, there is for you by day prolonged occupation with ordinary duties,
And remember the Name of your Lord and devote yourself to Him with a complete devotion.
(He Alone is) the Lord of the east and the west, La ilaha illa Huwa (none has the right to be worshipped but He). So take Him Alone as Wakil (Disposer of your affairs).
And be patient (O Muhammad SAW) with what they say, and keep away from them in a good way.
And leave Me Alone to deal with the beliers (those who deny My Verses, etc.), and those who are in possession of good things of life. And give them respite for a little while.
Verily, with Us are fetters (to bind them), and a raging Fire.
And a food that chokes, and a painful torment.
On the Day when the earth and the mountains will be in violent shake, and the mountains will be a heap of sand poured out and flowing down.
Verily, We have sent to you (O men) a Messenger (Muhammad SAW) to be a witness over you, as We did send a Messenger [Musa (Moses)] to Fir'aun (Pharaoh).
But Fir'aun (Pharaoh) disobeyed the Messenger [Musa (Moses)], so We seized him with a severe punishment.
Then how can you avoid the punishment, if you disbelieve, on a Day that will make the children grey-headed (i.e. the Day of Resurrection)?
Whereon the heaven will be cleft asunder? His Promise is certainly to be accomplished.
Verily, this is an admonition, therefore whosoever will, let him take a Path to His Lord!
Verily, your Lord knows that you do stand (to pray at night) a little less than two-thirds of the night, or half the night, or a third of the night, and so do a party of those with you, And Allah measures the night and the day. He knows that you are unable to pray the whole night, so He has turned to you (in mercy). So, recite you of the Qur'an as much as may be easy for you. He knows that there will be some among you sick, others travelling through the land, seeking of Allah's Bounty; yet others fighting in Allah's Cause. So recite as much of the Qur'an as may be easy (for you), and perform As-Salat (Iqamat-as-Salat) and give Zakat, and lend to Allah a goodly loan, and whatever good you send before you for yourselves, (i.e. Nawafil non-obligatory acts of worship: prayers, charity, fasting, Hajj and 'Umrah, etc.), you will certainly find it with Allah, better and greater in reward. And seek Forgiveness of Allah. Verily, Allah is Oft-Forgiving, Most-Merciful.
O you (Muhammad SAW) enveloped (in garments)!
Arise and warn!
And your Lord (Allah) magnify!
And your garments purify!
And keep away from Ar-Rujz (the idols)!
And give not a thing in order to have more (or consider not your deeds of Allah's obedience as a favour to Allah).
And be patient for the sake of your Lord (i.e. perform your duty to Allah)!
Then, when the Trumpet is sounded (i.e. its second blowing);
Truly, that Day will be a Hard Day.
Far from easy for the disbelievers.
Leave Me Alone (to deal) with whom I created Alone (without any means, i.e. Al-Walid bin Al-Mughirah Al-Makhzumi)!
And then granted him resources in abundance.
And children to be by his side!
And made life smooth and comfortable for him!
After all that he desires that I should give more;
Nay! Verily, he has been stubborn and opposing Our Ayat (proofs, evidences, verses, lessons, signs, revelations, etc.).
I shall oblige him to (climb a slippery mountain in the Hell-fire called As-Sa'ud, or to) face a severe torment!
Verily, he thought and plotted;
So let him be cursed! How he plotted!
And once more let him be cursed, how he plotted!
Then he thought;
Then he frowned and he looked in a bad tempered way;
Then he turned back and was proud;
Then he said: "This is nothing but magic from that of old;
"This is nothing but the word of a human being!"
I will cast him into Hell-fire
And what will make you know exactly what Hell-fire is?
It spares not (any sinner), nor does it leave (anything unburnt)!
Burning the skins!
Over it are nineteen (angels as guardians and keepers of Hell).
And We have set none but angels as guardians of the Fire, and We have fixed their number (19) only as a trial for the disbelievers, in order that the people of the Scripture (Jews and Christians) may arrive at a certainty [that this Qur'an is the truth as it agrees with their Books i.e. their number (19) is written in the Taurat (Torah) and the Injeel (Gospel)] and the believers may increase in Faith (as this Qur'an is the truth) and that no doubts may be left for the people of the Scripture and the believers, and that those in whose hearts is a disease (of hypocrisy) and the disbelievers may say: "What Allah intends by this (curious) example ?" Thus Allah leads astray whom He wills and guides whom He wills. And none can know the hosts of your Lord but He. And this (Hell) is nothing else than a (warning) reminder to mankind.
Nay, and by the moon,
And by the night when it withdraws,
And by the dawn when it brightens,
Verily, it (Hell, or their denial of the Prophet Muhammad SAW, or the Day of Resurrection) is but one of the greatest calamities.
A warning to mankind,
To any of you that chooses to go forward (by working righteous deeds), or to remain behind (by commiting sins),
Every person is a pledge for what he has earned,
Except those on the Right, (i.e. the pious true believers of Islamic Monotheism);
In Gardens (Paradise) they will ask one another,
About Al-Mujrimun (polytheists, criminals, disbelievers, etc.), (And they will say to them):
"What has caused you to enter Hell?"
They will say: "We were not of those who used to offer their Salat (prayers)
"Nor we used to feed Al-Miskin (the poor);
"And we used to talk falsehood (all that which Allah hated) with vain talkers.
"And we used to belie the Day of Recompense
"Until there came to us (the death) that is certain."
So no intercession of intercessors will be of any use to them.
Then what is wrong with them (i.e. the disbelievers) that they turn away from (receiving) admonition?
As if they were frightened (wild) donkeys.
Fleeing from a hunter, or a lion, or a beast of prey.
Nay, everyone of them desires that he should be given pages spread out (coming from Allah with a writing that Islam is the right religion, and Muhammad SAW has come with the truth from Allah the Lord of the heavens and earth, etc.).
Nay! But they fear not the Hereafter (from Allah's punishment).
Nay, verily, this (Qur'an) is an admonition,
So whosoever will (let him read it), and receive admonition (from it)!
And they will not receive admonition unless Allah wills; He (Allah) is the One, deserving that mankind should be afraid of, and should be dutiful to Him, and should not take any Ilah (God) along with Him, and He is the One Who forgives (sins).
I swear by the Day of Resurrection;
And I swear by the self-reproaching person (a believer).
Does man (a disbeliever) think that We shall not assemble his bones?
Yes, We are Able to put together in perfect order the tips of his fingers.
Nay! (Man denies Resurrection and Reckoning. So) he desires to continue committing sins.
He asks: "When will be this Day of Resurrection?"
So, when the sight shall be dazed,
And the moon will be eclipsed,
And the sun and moon will be joined together (by going one into the other or folded up or deprived of their light, etc.)
On that Day man will say: "Where (is the refuge) to flee?"
No! There is no refuge!
Unto your Lord (Alone) will be the place of rest that Day.
On that Day man will be informed of what he sent forward (of his evil or good deeds), and what he left behind (of his good or evil traditions).
Nay! Man will be a witness against himself [as his body parts (skin, hands, legs, etc.) will speak about his deeds].
Though he may put forth his excuses (to cover his evil deeds).
Move not your tongue concerning (the Qur'an, O Muhammad SAW) to make haste therewith.
It is for Us to collect it and to give you (O Muhammad SAW) the ability to recite it (the Qur'an),
And when We have recited it to you [O Muhammad SAW through Jibrael (Gabriel)], then follow you its (the Qur'an's) recital.
Then it is for Us (Allah) to make it clear to you,
Not [as you think, that you (mankind) will not be resurrected and recompensed for your deeds], but (you men) love the present life of this world,
And leave (neglect) the Hereafter.
Some faces that Day shall be Nadirah (shining and radiant).
Looking at their Lord (Allah);
And some faces, that Day, will be Basirah (dark, gloomy, frowning, and sad),
Thinking that some calamity was about to fall on them;
Nay, when (the soul) reaches to the collar bone (i.e. up to the throat in its exit),
And it will be said: "Who can cure him and save him from death?"
And he (the dying person) will conclude that it was (the time) of departing (death);
And leg will be joined with another leg (shrouded)
The drive will be, on that Day, to your Lord (Allah)!
So he (the disbeliever) neither believed (in this Qur'an, in the Message of Muhammad SAW) nor prayed!
But on the contrary, he belied (this Qur'an and the Message of Muhammad SAW) and turned away!
Then he walked in full pride to his family admiring himself!
Woe to you [O man (disbeliever)]! And then (again) woe to you!
Again, woe to you [O man (disbeliever)]! And then (again) woe to you!
Does man think that he will be left Suda [neglected without being punished or rewarded for the obligatory duties enjoined by his Lord (Allah) on him]?
Was he not a Nutfah (mixed male and female discharge of semen) poured forth?
Then he became an 'Alaqa (a clot); then (Allah) shaped and fashioned (him) in due proportion.
And made him in two sexes, male and female.
Is not He (Allah Who does that), Able to give life to the dead? (Yes! He is Able to do all things).
Has there not been over man a period of time, when he was nothing to be mentioned?
Verily, We have created man from Nutfah drops of mixed semen (discharge of man and woman), in order to try him, so We made him hearer, seer.
Verily, We showed him the way, whether he be grateful or ungrateful.
Verily, We have prepared for the disbelievers iron chains, iron collars, and a blazing Fire.
Verily, the Abrar (pious, who fear Allah and avoid evil), shall drink a cup (of wine) mixed with water from a spring in Paradise called Kafur.
A spring wherefrom the slaves of Allah will drink, causing it to gush forth abundantly.
They (are those who) fulfill (their) vows, and they fear a Day whose evil will be wide-spreading.
And they give food, inspite of their love for it (or for the love of Him), to Miskin (poor), the orphan, and the captive,
(Saying): "We feed you seeking Allah's Countenance only. We wish for no reward, nor thanks from you.
"Verily, We fear from our Lord a Day, hard and distressful, that will make the faces look horrible (from extreme dislikeness to it)."
So Allah saved them from the evil of that Day, and gave them Nadratan (a light of beauty) and joy.
And their recompense shall be Paradise, and silken garments, because they were patient.
Reclining therein on raised thrones, they will see there neither the excessive heat of the sun, nor the excessive bitter cold, (as in Paradise there is no sun and no moon).
And the shade thereof is close upon them, and the bunches of fruit thereof will hang low within their reach.
And amongst them will be passed round vessels of silver and cups of crystal,
Crystal-clear, made of silver. They will determine the measure thereof according to their wishes.
And they will be given to drink there a cup (of wine) mixed with Zanjabil (ginger, etc.),
A spring there, called Salsabil.
And round about them will (serve) boys of everlasting youth. If you see them, you would think them scattered pearls.
And when you look there (in Paradise), you will see a delight (that cannot be imagined), and a great dominion.
Their garments will be of fine green silk, and gold embroidery. They will be adorned with bracelets of silver, and their Lord will give them a pure drink.
(And it will be said to them): "Verily, this is a reward for you, and your endeavour has been accepted."
Verily! It is We Who have sent down the Qur'an to you (O Muhammad SAW) by stages.
Therefore be patient (O Muhammad SAW) and submit to the Command of your Lord (Allah, by doing your duty to Him and by conveying His Message to mankind), and obey neither a sinner nor a disbeliever among them.
And remember the Name of your Lord every morning and afternoon [i.e. offering of the Morning (Fajr), Zuhr, and 'Asr prayers].
And during night, prostrate yourself to Him (i.e. the offering of Maghrib and 'Isha' prayers), and glorify Him a long night through (i.e. Tahajjud prayer).
Verily! These (disbelievers) love the present life of this world, and put behind them a heavy Day (that will be hard).
It is We Who created them, and We have made them of strong built. And when We will, We can replace them with others like them with a complete replacement.
Verily! This (Verses of the Qur'an) is an admonition, so whosoever wills, let him take a Path to his Lord (Allah).
But you cannot will, unless Allah wills. Verily, Allah is Ever All-Knowing, All-Wise.
He will admit to His Mercy whom He will and as for the Zalimun, (polytheists, wrong-doers, etc.) He has prepared a painful torment.
By the winds (or angels or the Messengers of Allah) sent forth one after another.
And by the winds that blow violently,
And by the winds that scatter clouds and rain;
And by the Verses (of the Qur'an) that separate the right from the wrong.
And by the angels that bring the revelations to the Messengers,
To cut off all excuses or to warn;
Surely, what you are promised must come to pass.
Then when the stars lose their lights;
And when the heaven is cleft asunder;
And when the mountains are blown away;
And when the Messengers are gathered to their time appointed;
For what Day are these signs postponed?
For the Day of sorting out (the men of Paradise from the men destined for Hell).
And what will explain to you what is the Day of sorting out?
Woe that Day to the deniers (of the Day of Resurrection)!
Did We not destroy the ancients?
So shall We make later generations to follow them.
Thus do We deal with the Mujrimun (polytheists, disbelievers, sinners, criminals, etc.)!
Woe that Day to the deniers (of the Day of Resurrection)!
Did We not create you from a worthless water (semen, etc.)?
Then We placed it in a place of safety (womb),
For a known period (determined by gestation)?
So We did measure, and We are the Best to measure (the things).
Woe that Day to the deniers (of the Day of Resurrection)!
Have We not made the earth a receptacle?
For the living and the dead.
And have placed therein firm, and tall mountains; and have given you to drink sweet water?
Woe that Day to the deniers (of the Day of Resurrection)!
(It will be said to the disbelievers): "Depart you to that which you used to deny!
"Depart you to a shadow (of Hell-fire smoke ascending) in three columns,
"Neither shading, nor of any use against the fierce flame of the Fire."
Verily! It (Hell) throws sparks (huge) as Al-Qasr [a fort or a Qasr (huge log of wood)],
As if they were Jimalatun Sufr (yellow camels or bundles of ropes)."
Woe that Day to the deniers (of the Day of Resurrection)!
That will be a Day when they shall not speak (during some part of it),
And they will not be permitted to put forth any excuse.
Woe that Day to the deniers (of the Day of Resurrection)!
That will be a Day of Decision! We have brought you and the men of old together!
So if you have a plot, use it against Me (Allah swt )!
Woe that Day to the deniers (of the Day of Resurrection)!
Verily, the Muttaqun (pious - see V.2:2) shall be amidst shades and springs.
And fruits, such as they desire.
"Eat and drink comfortably for that which you used to do.
Verily, thus We reward the Muhsinun (good-doers).
Woe that Day to the deniers (of the Day of Resurrection)!
(O you disbelievers)! Eat and enjoy yourselves (in this worldly life) for a little while. Verily, you are the Mujrimun (polytheists, disbelievers, sinners, criminals, etc.).
Woe that Day to the deniers (of the Day of Resurrection)!
And when it is said to them: "Bow down yourself (in prayer)!" They bow not down (offer not their prayers).
Woe that Day to the deniers (of the Day of Resurrection)!
Then in what statement after this (the Qur'an) will they believe?
What are they asking (one another)?
About the great news, (i.e. Islamic Monotheism, the Qur'an, which Prophet Muhammad (Peace be upon him)brought and the Day of Resurrection, etc.),
About which they are in disagreement.
Nay, they will come to know!
Nay, again, they will come to know!
Have We not made the earth as a bed,
And the mountains as pegs?
And We have created you in pairs (male and female, tall and short, good and bad, etc.).
And have made your sleep as a thing for rest.
And have made the night as a covering (through its darkness),
And have made the day for livelihood.
And We have built above you seven strong (heavens),
And have made (therein) a shinning lamp (sun).
And have sent down from the rainy clouds abundant water.
That We may produce therewith corn and vegetations,
And gardens of thick growth.
Verily, the Day of Decision is a fixed time,
The Day when the Trumpet will be blown, and you shall come forth in crowds (groups);
And the heaven shall be opened, and it will become as gates,
And the mountains shall be moved away from their places and they will be as if they were a mirage.
Truly, Hell is a place of ambush,
A dwelling place for the Taghun (those who transgress the boundry limits set by Allah like polytheists, disbelievers in the Oneness of Allah, hyprocrites, sinners, criminals, etc.),
They will abide therein for ages,
Nothing cool shall they taste therein, nor any drink.
Except boiling water, and dirty wound discharges.
An exact recompense (according to their evil crimes).
For verily, they used not to look for a reckoning.
But they belied Our Ayat (proofs, evidences, verses, lessons, signs, revelations, and that which Our Prophet (Peace be upon him) brought) completely.
And all things We have recorded in a Book.
So taste you (the results of your evil actions); no increase shall We give you, except in torment.
Verily, for the Muttaqun, there will be a success (Paradise);
Gardens and grapeyards;
And young full-breasted (mature) maidens of equal age;
And a full cup (of wine).
No Laghw (dirty, false, evil talk) shall they hear therein, nor lying;
A reward from your Lord, an ample calculated gift (according to the best of their good deeds).
(From) the Lord of the heavens and the earth, and whatsoever is in between them, the Most Beneficent, none can dare to speak with Him (on the Day of Resurrection except after His Leave).
The Day that Ar-Ruh [Jibrael (Gabriel) or another angel] and the angels will stand forth in rows, none shall speak except him whom the Most Beneficent (Allah) allows, and he will speak what is right.
That is without doubt the True Day, so, whosoever wills, let him seek a place with (or a way to) His Lord (by obeying Him in this worldly life)!
Verily, We have warned you of a near torment, the Day when man will see that (the deeds) which his hands have sent forth, and the disbeliever will say: "Woe to me! Would that I were dust!"
By those (angels) who pull out (the souls of the disbelievers and the wicked) with great violence;
By those (angels) who gently take out (the souls of the believers);
And by those that swim along (i.e. angels or planets in their orbits, etc.).
And by those that press forward as in a race (i.e. the angels or stars or the horses, etc.).
And by those angels who arrange to do the Commands of their Lord, (so verily, you disbelievers will be called to account).
On the Day (when the first blowing of the Trumpet is blown), the earth and the mountains will shake violently (and everybody will die),
The second blowing of the Trumpet follows it (and everybody will be raised up),
(Some) hearts that Day will shake with fear and anxiety.
Their eyes cast down.
They say: "Shall we indeed be returned to (our) former state of life?
"Even after we are crumbled bones?"
They say: "It would in that case, be a return with loss!"
But only, it will be a single Zajrah [shout (i.e., the second blowing of the Trumpet)]. (See Verse 37:19).
When, behold, they find themselves over the earth alive after their death,
Has there come to you the story of Musa (Moses)?
When his Lord called him in the sacred valley of Tuwa,
Go to Fir'aun (Pharaoh), verily, he has transgressed all bounds (in crimes, sins, polytheism, disbelief, etc.).
And say to him: "Would you purify yourself (from the sin of disbelief by becoming a believer)",
And that I guide you to your Lord, so you should fear Him?
Then [Musa (Moses)] showed him the great sign (miracles).
But [Fir'aun (Pharaoh)] belied and disobeyed;
Then he turned his back, striving hard (against Allah).
Then he gathered his people and cried aloud,
Saying: "I am your lord, most high",
So Allah, seized him with punishment for his last [i.e. his saying: "I am your lord, most high") (see Verse 79:24)] and first [(i.e. his saying, "O chiefs! I know not that you have a god other than I" (see Verse 28:38)] transgression.
Verily, in this is an instructive admonition for whosoever fears Allah.
Are you more difficult to create, or is the heaven that He constructed?
He raised its height, and He has equally ordered it,
Its night He covers with darkness, and its forenoon He brings out (with light).
And after that He spread the earth;
And brought forth therefrom its water and its pasture;
And the mountains He has fixed firmly;
(To be) a provision and benefit for you and your cattle.
But when there comes the greatest catastrophe (i.e. the Day of Recompense, etc.),
The Day when man shall remember what he strove for,
And Hell-fire shall be made apparent in full view for (every) one who sees,
Then, for him who Tagha (transgressed all bounds, in disbelief, oppression and evil deeds of disobedience to Allah).
And preferred the life of this world (by following his evil desires and lusts),
Verily, his abode will be Hell-fire;
But as for him who feared standing before his Lord, and restrained himself from impure evil desires, and lusts.
Verily, Paradise will be his abode.
They ask you (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) about the Hour, - when will be its appointed time?
You have no knowledge to say anything about it,
To your Lord belongs (the knowledge of) the term thereof?
You (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) are only a warner for those who fear it,
The Day they see it, (it will be) as if they had not tarried (in this world) except an afternoon or a morning.
(The Prophet (Peace be upon him)) frowned and turned away,
Because there came to him the blind man (i.e. 'Abdullah bin Umm-Maktum, who came to the Prophet (Peace be upon him) while he was preaching to one or some of the Quraish chiefs).
But what could tell you that per chance he might become pure (from sins)?
Or that he might receive admonition, and that the admonition might profit him?
As for him who thinks himself self-sufficient,
To him you attend;
What does it matter to you if he will not become pure (from disbelief, you are only a Messenger, your duty is to convey the Message of Allah).
But as to him who came to you running.
And is afraid (of Allah and His Punishment),
Of him you are neglectful and divert your attention to another,
Nay, (do not do like this), indeed it (these Verses of this Qur'an) are an admonition,
So whoever wills, let him pay attention to it.
(It is) in Records held (greatly) in honour (Al-Lauh Al-Mahfuz).
Exalted (in dignity), purified,
In the hands of scribes (angels).
Honourable and obedient.
Be cursed (the disbelieving) man! How ungrateful he is!
From what thing did He create him?
From Nutfah (male and female semen drops) He created him, and then set him in due proportion;
Then He makes the Path easy for him;
Then He causes him to die, and puts him in his grave;
Then, when it is His Will, He will resurrect him (again).
Nay, but (man) has not done what He commanded him.
Then let man look at his food,
That We pour forth water in abundance,
And We split the earth in clefts,
And We cause therein the grain to grow,
And grapes and clover plants (i.e. green fodder for the cattle),
And olives and date-palms,
And gardens, dense with many trees,
And fruits and Abba (herbage, etc.),
(To be) a provision and benefit for you and your cattle.
Then, when there comes As-Sakhkhah (the Day of Resurrection's second blowing of Trumpet),
That Day shall a man flee from his brother,
And from his mother and his father,
And from his wife and his children.
Everyman, that Day, will have enough to make him careless of others.
Some faces that Day, will be bright (true believers of Islamic Monotheism).
Laughing, rejoicing at good news (of Paradise).
And other faces, that Day, will be dust-stained;
Darkness will cover them,
Such will be the Kafarah (disbelievers in Allah, in His Oneness, and in His Messenger Muhammad (Peace be upon him), etc.), the Fajarah (wicked evil doers).
When the sun Kuwwirat (wound round and lost its light and is overthrown ).
And when the stars shall fall;
And when the mountains shall made to pass away;
And when the pregnant she-camels shall be neglected;
And when the wild beasts shall be gathered together;
And when the seas shall become as blazing Fire or shall overflow;
And when the souls shall be joined with their bodies;
And when the female (infant) buried alive (as the pagan Arabs used to do) shall be questioned.
For what sin she was killed?
And when the written pages of deeds (good and bad) of every person shall be laid open;
And when the heaven shall be stripped off and taken away from its place;
And when Hell-fire shall be kindled to fierce ablaze.
And when Paradise shall be brought near,
(Then) every person will know what he has brought (of good and evil).
So verily, I swear by the planets that recede (i.e. disappear during the day and appear during the night).
And by the planets that move swiftly and hide themselves,
And by the night as it departs;
And by the dawn as it brightens;
Verily, this is the Word (this Qur'an brought by) a most honourable messenger [Jibrael (Gabriel), from Allah to the Prophet Muhammad (Peace be upon him)].
Owner of power, and high rank with (Allah) the Lord of the Throne,
Obeyed (by the angels), trustworthy there (in the heavens).
And (O people) your companion (Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) is not a madman;
And indeed he (Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) saw him [Jibrael (Gabriel)] in the clear horizon (towards the east).
And he (Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) withholds not a knowledge of the unseen.
And it (the Qur'an) is not the word of the outcast Shaitan (Satan).
Then where are you going?
Verily, this (the Qur'an) is no less than a Reminder to (all) the 'Alamin (mankind and jinns).
To whomsoever among you who wills to walk straight,
And you will not, unless (it be) that Allah wills, the Lord of the 'Alamin (mankind, jinns and all that exists).
When the heaven is cleft asunder.
And when the stars have fallen and scattered;
And when the seas are burst forth (got dried up);
And when the graves are turned upside down (and they bring out their contents)
(Then) a person will know what he has sent forward and (what he has) left behind (of good or bad deeds).
O man! What has made you careless concerning your Lord, the Most Generous?
Who created you, fashioned you perfectly, and gave you due proportion;
In whatever form He willed, He put you together.
Nay! But you deny the Recompense (reward for good deeds and punishment for evil deeds).
But verily, over you (are appointed angels in charge of mankind) to watch you,
Kiraman (honourable) Katibin writing down (your deeds),
They know all that you do.
Verily, the Abrar (pious and righteous) will be in delight (Paradise);
And verily, the Fujjar (the wicked, disbelievers, sinners and evil-doers) will be in the blazing Fire (Hell),
In which they will enter, and taste its burning flame on the Day of Recompense,
And they (Al-Fujjar) will not be absent therefrom (i.e. will not go out from the Hell).
And what will make you know what the Day of Recompense is?
Again, what will make you know what the Day of Recompense is?
(It will be) the Day when no person shall have power (to do) anything for another, and the Decision, that Day, will be (wholly) with Allah.
Woe to Al-Mutaffifin [those who give less in measure and weight (decrease the rights of others)],
Those who, when they have to receive by measure from men, demand full measure,
And when they have to give by measure or weight to men, give less than due.
Think they not that they will be resurrected (for reckoning),
On a Great Day,
The Day when (all) mankind will stand before the Lord of the 'Alamin (mankind, jinns and all that exists)?
Nay! Truly, the Record (writing of the deeds) of the Fujjar (disbelievers, sinners, evil-doers and wicked) is (preserved) in Sijjin.
And what will make you know what Sijjin is?
A Register inscribed.
Woe, that Day, to those who deny [(Allah, His Angels, His Books, His Messengers, the Day of Resurrection, and Al-Qadar (Divine Preordainments)].
Those who deny the Day of Recompense.
And none can deny it except every transgressor beyond bounds, (in disbelief, oppression and disobedience of Allah, the sinner!)
When Our Verses (of the Qur'an) are recited to him he says: "Tales of the ancients!"
Nay! But on their hearts is the Ran (covering of sins and evil deeds) which they used to earn.
Nay! Surely, they (evil-doers) will be veiled from seeing their Lord that Day.
Then, verily they will indeed enter and taste the burning flame of Hell.
Then, it will be said to them: "This is what you used to deny!"
Nay! Verily, the Record (writing of the deeds) of Al-Abrar (the pious who fear Allah and avoid evil), is (preserved) in 'Illiyyun.
And what will make you know what 'Illiyyun is?
A Register inscribed.
To which bear witness those nearest (to Allah, i.e. the angels).
Verily, Al-Abrar (the pious who fear Allah and avoid evil) will be in delight (Paradise).
On thrones, looking (at all things).
You will recognise in their faces the brightness of delight.
They will be given to drink pure sealed wine.
The last thereof (that wine) will be the smell of musk, and for this let (all) those strive who want to strive (i.e. hasten earnestly to the obedience of Allah).
It (that wine) will be mixed with Tasnim.
A spring whereof drink those nearest to Allah.
Verily! (During the worldly life) those who committed crimes used to laugh at those who believed.
And whenever they passed by them, used to wink one to another (in mockery);
And when they returned to their own people, they would return jesting;
And when they saw them, they said: "Verily! These have indeed gone astray!"
But they (disbelievers, sinners) had not been sent as watchers over them (the believers).
But this Day (the Day of Resurrection) those who believe will laugh at the disbelievers
On (high) thrones, looking (at all things).
Are not the disbelievers paid (fully) for what they used to do?
When the heaven is split asunder,
And listens and obeys its Lord, and it must do so;
And when the earth is stretched forth,
And has cast out all that was in it and became empty,
And listens and obeys its Lord, and it must do so;
O man! Verily, you are returning towards your Lord with your deeds and actions (good or bad), a sure returning, so you will meet (i.e. the results of your deeds which you did).
Then, as for him who will be given his Record in his right hand,
He surely will receive an easy reckoning,
And will return to his family in joy!
But whosoever is given his Record behind his back,
He will invoke (his) destruction,
And shall enter a blazing Fire, and made to taste its burning.
Verily, he was among his people in joy!
Verily, he thought that he would never come back (to Us)!
Yes! Verily, his Lord has been ever beholding him!
So I swear by the afterglow of sunset;
And by the night and whatever it gathers in its darkness;
And by the moon when it is at the full,
You shall certainly travel from stage to stage (in this life and in the Hereafter).
What is the matter with them, that they believe not?
And when the Qur'an is recited to them, they fall not prostrate,
Nay, (on the contrary), those who disbelieve, belie (Prophet Muhammad (Peace be upon him) and whatever he brought, i.e. this Qur'an and Islamic Monotheism, etc.).
And Allah knows best what they gather (of good and bad deeds),
So announce to them a painful torment.
Save those who believe and do righteous good deeds, for them is a reward that will never come to an end (i.e. Paradise).
By the heaven, holding the big stars.
And by the Promised Day (i.e. the Day of Resurrection);
And by the witnessing day (i.e. Friday), and by the witnessed day [i.e. the day of 'Arafat (Hajj) the ninth of Dhul-Hijjah];
Cursed were the people of the ditch (the story of the Boy and the King).
Fire supplied (abundantly) with fuel,
When they sat by it (fire),
And they witnessed what they were doing against the believers (i.e. burning them).
They had nothing against them, except that they believed in Allah, the All-Mighty, Worthy of all Praise!
Who, to Whom belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth! And Allah is Witness over everything.
Verily, those who put into trial the believing men and believing women (by torturing them and burning them), and then do not turn in repentance, (to Allah), will have the torment of Hell, and they will have the punishment of the burning Fire.
Verily, those who believe and do righteous good deeds, for them will be Gardens under which rivers flow (Paradise). That is the great success.
Verily, (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) the Grip (Punishment) of your Lord is severe.
Verily, He it is Who begins (punishment) and repeats (punishment in the Hereafter) (or originates the creation of everything, and then repeats it on the Day of Resurrection).
And He is Oft-Forgiving, full of love (towards the pious who are real true believers of Islamic Monotheism),
Owner of the throne, the Glorious
He does what He intends (or wills).
Has the story reached you of the hosts,
Of Fir'aun (Pharaoh) and Thamud?
Nay! The disbelievers (persisted) in denying (Prophet Muhammad (Peace be upon him) and his Message of Islamic Monotheism).
And Allah encompasses them from behind! (i.e. all their deeds are within His Knowledge, and He will requite them for their deeds).
Nay! This is a Glorious Qur'an,
(Inscribed) in Al-Lauh Al-Mahfuz (The Preserved Tablet)!
By the heaven, and At-Tariq (the night-comer, i.e. the bright star);
And what will make you to know what At-Tariq (night-comer) is?
(It is) the star of piercing brightness;
There is no human being but has a protector over him (or her) (i.e. angels incharge of each human being guarding him, writing his good and bad deeds, etc.)
So let man see from what he is created!
He is created from a water gushing forth
Proceeding from between the back-bone and the ribs,
Verily, (Allah) is Able to bring him back (to life)!
The Day when all the secrets (deeds, prayers, fasting, etc.) will be examined (as to their truth).
Then will (man) have no power, nor any helper.
By the sky (having rain clouds) which gives rain, again and again.
And the earth which splits (with the growth of trees and plants),
Verily! This (the Qur'an) is the Word that separates (the truth from falsehood, and commands strict legal laws for mankind to cut the roots of evil).
And it is not a thing for amusement.
Verily, they are but plotting a plot (against you O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)).
And I (too) am planning a plan.
So give a respite to the disbelievers. Deal you gently with them for a while.
Glorify the Name of your Lord, the Most High,
Who has created (everything), and then proportioned it;
And Who has measured (preordainments for each and everything even to be blessed or wretched); then guided (i.e. showed mankind the right as well as wrong paths, and guided the animals to pasture);
And Who brings out the pasturage,
And then makes it dark stubble.
We shall make you to recite (the Qur'an), so you (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) shall not forget (it),
Except what Allah, may will, He knows what is apparent and what is hidden.
And We shall make easy for you (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) the easy way (i.e. the doing of righteous deeds).
Therefore remind (men) in case the reminder profits (them).
The reminder will be received by him who fears (Allah),
But it will be avoided by the wretched,
Who will enter the great Fire and made to taste its burning,
Wherein he will neither die (to be in rest) nor live (a good living).
Indeed whosoever purifies himself (by avoiding polytheism and accepting Islamic Monotheism) shall achieve success,
And remembers (glorifies) the Name of his Lord (worships none but Allah), and prays (five compulsory prayers and Nawafil additional prayers).
Nay, you prefer the life of this world;
Although the Hereafter is better and more lasting.
Verily! This is in the former Scriptures,
The Scriptures of Ibrahim (Abraham) and Musa (Moses).
Has there come to you the narration of the overwhelming (i.e. the Day of Resurrection);
Some faces, that Day, will be humiliated (in the Hell-fire, i.e. the faces of all disbelievers, Jews and Christians, etc.).
Labouring (hard in the worldly life by worshipping others besides Allah), weary (in the Hereafter with humility and disgrace).
They will enter in the hot blazing Fire,
They will be given to drink from a boiling spring,
No food will there be for them but a poisonous thorny plant,
Which will neither nourish nor avail against hunger.
(Other) faces, that Day, will be joyful,
Glad with their endeavour (for their good deeds which they did in this world, along with the true Faith of Islamic Monotheism).
In a lofty Paradise.
Where they shall neither hear harmful speech nor falsehood,
Therein will be a running spring,
Therein will be thrones raised high,
And cups set at hand.
And cushions set in rows,
And rich carpets (all) spread out.
Do they not look at the camels, how they are created?
And at the heaven, how it is raised?
And at the mountains, how they are rooted and fixed firm?
And at the earth, how it is spread out?
So remind them (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)), you are only a one who reminds.
You are not a dictator over them.
Save the one who turns away and disbelieves
Then Allah will punish him with the greatest punishment.
Verily, to Us will be their return;
Then verily, for Us will be their reckoning.
By the dawn;
By the ten nights (i.e. the first ten days of the month of Dhul-Hijjah),
And by the even and the odd (of all the creations of Allah).
And by the night when it departs.
There is indeed in them (the above oaths) sufficient proofs for men of understanding (and that, they should avoid all kinds of sins and disbeliefs, etc.)!
Did you (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) not see (thought) how your Lord dealt with 'Ad (people)?
Who were very tall like lofty pillars,
The like of which were not created in the land?
And (with) Thamud (people), who cut (hewed) out rocks in the valley (to make dwellings)?
And (with) Fir'aun (Pharaoh), who had pegs (who used to torture men by binding them to pegs)?
Who did transgress beyond bounds in the lands (in the disobedience of Allah).
And made therein much mischief.
So your Lord poured on them different kinds of severe torment.
Verily, your Lord is Ever Watchful (over them).
As for man, when his Lord tries him by giving him honour and gifts, then he says (puffed up): "My Lord has honoured me."
But when He tries him, by straitening his means of life, he says: "My Lord has humiliated me!"
Nay! But you treat not the orphans with kindness and generosity (i.e. you neither treat them well, nor give them their exact right of inheritance)!
And urge not on the feeding of AlMiskin (the poor)!
And you devour inheritance all with greed,
And you love wealth with much love!
Nay! When the earth is ground to powder,
And your Lord comes with the angels in rows,
And Hell will be brought near that Day. On that Day will man remember, but how will that remembrance (then) avail him?
He will say: "Alas! Would that I had sent forth (good deeds) for (this) my life!"
So on that Day, none will punish as He will punish.
And none will bind as He will bind.
(It will be said to the pious): "O (you) the one in (complete) rest and satisfaction!
"Come back to your Lord, Well-pleased (yourself) and well-pleasing unto Him!
"Enter you, then, among My honoured slaves,
"And enter you My Paradise!"
I swear by this city (Makkah);
And you are free (from sin, to punish the enemies of Islam on the Day of the conquest) in this city (Makkah),
And by the begetter (i.e. Adam) and that which he begot (i.e. his progeny);
Verily, We have created man in toil.
Thinks he that none can overcome him?
He says (boastfully): "I have wasted wealth in abundance!"
Thinks he that none sees him?
Have We not made for him a pair of eyes?
And a tongue and a pair of lips?
And shown him the two ways (good and evil)?
But he has made no effort to pass on the path that is steep.
And what will make you know the path that is steep?
(It is) Freeing a neck (slave, etc.)
Or giving food in a day of hunger (famine),
To an orphan near of kin.
Or to a Miskin (poor) afflicted with misery.
Then he became one of those who believed, and recommended one another to perseverance and patience, and (also) recommended one another to pity and compassion.
They are those on the Right Hand (the dwellers of Paradise),
But those who disbelieved in Our Ayat (proofs, evidences, verses, lessons, signs, revelations, etc.), they are those on the Left Hand (the dwellers of Hell).
The Fire will be shut over them (i.e. they will be enveloped by the Fire without any opening or window or outlet.
And by the sun and its brightness;
And by the moon as it follows it (the sun);
And by the day as it shows up (the sun's) brightness;
And by the night as it conceals it (the sun);
And by the heaven and Him Who built it;
And by the earth and Him Who spread it,
And by Nafs (Adam or a person or a soul, etc.), and Him Who perfected him in proportion;
Then He showed him what is wrong for him and what is right for him;
Indeed he succeeds who purifies his ownself (i.e. obeys and performs all that Allah ordered, by following the true Faith of Islamic Monotheism and by doing righteous good deeds).
And indeed he fails who corrupts his ownself (i.e. disobeys what Allah has ordered by rejecting the true Faith of Islamic Monotheism or by following polytheism, etc. or by doing every kind of evil wicked deeds).
Thamud (people) denied (their Prophet) through their transgression (by rejecting the true Faith of Islamic Monotheism, and by following polytheism, and by committing every kind of sin).
When the most wicked man among them went forth (to kill the she-camel).
But the Messenger of Allah [Salih (Saleh)] said to them: "Be cautious! Fear the evil end. That is the she-camel of Allah! (Do not harm it) and bar it not from having its drink!"
Then they denied him and they killed it. So their Lord destroyed them because of their sin, and made them equal in destruction (i.e. all grades of people, rich and poor, strong and weak, etc.)!
And He (Allah) feared not the consequences thereof.
By the night as it envelops;
And by the day as it appears in brightness;
And by Him Who created male and female;
Certainly, your efforts and deeds are diverse (different in aims and purposes);
As for him who gives (in charity) and keeps his duty to Allah and fears Him,
And believes in Al-Husna.
We will make smooth for him the path of ease (goodness).
But he who is greedy miser and thinks himself self-sufficient.
And gives the lie to Al-Husna (see Verse No: 6 footnote);
We will make smooth for him the path for evil;
And what will his wealth benefit him when he goes down (in destruction).
Truly! Ours it is (to give) guidance,
And truly, unto Us (belong) the last (Hereafter) and the first (this world).
Therefore I have warned you of a Fire blazing fiercely (Hell);
None shall enter it save the most wretched,
Who denies and turns away.
And Al-Muttaqun (the pious and righteous - see V.2:2) will be far removed from it (Hell).
He who spends his wealth for increase in self-purification,
And have in his mind no favour from anyone for which a reward is expected in return,
Except only the desire to seek the Countenance of his Lord, the Most High;
He surely will be pleased (when he will enter Paradise).
By the forenoon (after sun-rise);
And by the night when it is still (or darkens);
Your Lord (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) has neither forsaken you nor hated you.
And indeed the Hereafter is better for you than the present (life of this world).
And verily, your Lord will give you (all i.e. good) so that you shall be well-pleased.
Did He not find you (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) an orphan and gave you a refuge?
And He found you unaware (of the Qur'an, its legal laws, and Prophethood, etc.) and guided you?
And He found you poor, and made you rich (selfsufficient with selfcontentment, etc.)?
Therefore, treat not the orphan with oppression,
And repulse not the beggar;
And proclaim the Grace of your Lord (i.e. the Prophethood and all other Graces).
Have We not opened your breast for you (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him))?
And removed from you your burden,
Which weighed down your back?
And raised high your fame?
So verily, with the hardship, there is relief,
Verily, with the hardship, there is relief (i.e. there is one hardship with two reliefs, so one hardship cannot overcome two reliefs).
So when you have finished (from your occupation), then stand up for Allah's worship (i.e. stand up for prayer).
And to your Lord (Alone) turn (all your intentions and hopes and) your invocations.
By the fig, and the olive,
By Mount Sinai,
And by this city of security (Makkah),
Verily, We created man of the best stature (mould),
Then We reduced him to the lowest of the low,
Save those who believe (in Islamic Monotheism) and do righteous deeds, then they shall have a reward without end (Paradise).
Then what (or who) causes you (O disbelievers) to deny the Recompense (i.e. Day of Resurrection)?
Is not Allah the Best of judges?
Read! In the Name of your Lord, Who has created (all that exists),
Has created man from a clot (a piece of thick coagulated blood).
Read! And your Lord is the Most Generous,
Who has taught (the writing) by the pen [the first person to write was Prophet Idrees (Enoch)],
Has taught man that which he knew not.
Nay! Verily, man does transgress all bounds (in disbelief and evil deed, etc.).
Because he considers himself self-sufficient.
Surely! Unto your Lord is the return.
Have you (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) seen him (i.e. Abu Jahl) who prevents,
A slave (Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) when he prays?
Tell me, if he (Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) is on the guidance (of Allah)?
Or enjoins piety?
Tell me if he (the disbeliever, Abu Jahl) denies (the truth, i.e. this Qur'an), and turns away?
Knows he not that Allah does see (what he does)?
Nay! If he (Abu Jahl) ceases not, We will catch him by the forelock,
A lying, sinful forelock!
Then, let him call upon his council (of helpers),
We will call the guards of Hell (to deal with him)!
Nay! (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him))! Do not obey him (Abu Jahl). Fall prostrate and draw near to Allah!
Verily! We have sent it (this Qur'an) down in the night of Al-Qadr (Decree)
And what will make you know what the night of Al-Qadr (Decree) is?
The night of Al-Qadr (Decree) is better than a thousand months (i.e. worshipping Allah in that night is better than worshipping Him a thousand months, i.e. 83 years and 4 months).
Therein descend the angels and the Ruh [Jibrael (Gabriel)] by Allah's Permission with all Decrees,
Peace! (All that night, there is Peace and Goodness from Allah to His believing slaves) until the appearance of dawn.
Those who disbelieve from among the people of the Scripture (Jews and Christians) and among Al-Mushrikun, were not going to leave (their disbelief) until there came to them clear evidence.
A Messenger (Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) from Allah, reciting (the Qur'an) purified pages [purified from Al-Batil (falsehood, etc.)].
Containing correct and straight laws from Allah.
And the people of the Scripture (Jews and Christians) differed not until after there came to them clear evidence. (i.e. Prophet Muhammad (Peace be upon him) and whatever was revealed to him).
And they were commanded not, but that they should worship Allah, and worship none but Him Alone (abstaining from ascribing partners to Him), and perform As-Salat (Iqamat-as-Salat) and give Zakat: and that is the right religion.
Verily, those who disbelieve (in the religion of Islam, the Qur'an and Prophet Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) from among the people of the Scripture (Jews and Christians) and Al-Mushrikun will abide in the Fire of Hell. They are the worst of creatures.
Verily, those who believe [in the Oneness of Allah, and in His Messenger Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) including all obligations ordered by Islam] and do righteous good deeds, they are the best of creatures.
Their reward with their Lord is 'Adn (Eden) Paradise (Gardens of Eternity), underneath which rivers flow, they will abide therein forever, Allah Well-Pleased with them, and they with Him. That is for him who fears his Lord.
When the earth is shaken with its (final) earthquake.
And when the earth throws out its burdens,
And man will say: "What is the matter with it?"
That Day it will declare its information (about all what happened over it of good or evil).
Because your Lord has inspired it.
That Day mankind will proceed in scattered groups that they may be shown their deeds.
So whosoever does good equal to the weight of an atom (or a small ant), shall see it.
And whosoever does evil equal to the weight of an atom (or a small ant), shall see it.
By the (steeds) that run, with panting (breath),
Striking sparks of fire (by their hooves),
And scouring to the raid at dawn
And raise the dust in clouds the while,
Penetrating forthwith as one into the midst (of the foe);
Verily! Man (disbeliever) is ungrateful to his Lord;
And to that fact he bears witness (by his deeds);
And verily, he is violent in the love of wealth.
Knows he not that when the contents of the graves are brought out and poured forth (all mankind is resurrected).
And that which is in the breasts (of men) shall be made known.
Verily, that Day (i.e. the Day of Resurrection) their Lord will be Well-Acquainted with them (as to their deeds), (and will reward them for their deeds).
Al-Qari'ah (the striking Hour i.e. the Day of Resurrection),
What is the striking (Hour)?
And what will make you know what the striking (Hour) is?
It is a Day whereon mankind will be like moths scattered about,
And the mountains will be like carded wool,
Then as for him whose balance (of good deeds) will be heavy,
He will live a pleasant life (in Paradise).
But as for him whose balance (of good deeds) will be light,
He will have his home in Hawiyah (pit, i.e. Hell).
And what will make you know what it is?
(It is) a hot blazing Fire!
The mutual rivalry for piling up of worldly things diverts you,
Until you visit the graves (i.e. till you die).
Nay! You shall come to know!
Again, Nay! You shall come to know!
Nay! If you knew with a sure knowledge (the end result of piling up, you would not have occupied yourselves in worldly things)
Verily, You shall see the blazing Fire (Hell)!
And again, you shall see it with certainty of sight!
Then, on that Day, you shall be asked about the delight (you indulged in, in this world)!
By Al-'Asr (the time).
Verily! Man is in loss,
Except those who believe (in Islamic Monotheism) and do righteous good deeds, and recommend one another to the truth (i.e. order one another to perform all kinds of good deeds (Al-Ma'which Allah has ordained, and abstain from all kinds of sins and evil deeds (Al-Munkar which Allah has forbidden), and recommend one another to patience (for the sufferings, harms, and injuries which one may encounter in Allah's Cause during preaching His religion of Islamic Monotheism or Jihad, etc.).
Woe to every slanderer and backbiter.
Who has gathered wealth and counted it,
He thinks that his wealth will make him last forever!
Nay! Verily, he will be thrown into the crushing Fire.
And what will make you know what the crushing Fire is?
The fire of Allah, kindled,
Which leaps up over the hearts,
Verily, it shall be closed in on them,
In pillars stretched forth (i.e. they will be punished in the Fire with pillars, etc.).
Have you (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) not seen how your Lord dealt with the Owners of the Elephant? [The elephant army which came from Yemen under the command of Abrahah Al-Ashram intending to destroy the Ka'bah at Makkah].
Did He not make their plot go astray?
And sent against them birds, in flocks,
Striking them with stones of Sijjil.
And made them like an empty field of stalks (of which the corn has been eaten up by cattle).
(It is a great Grace and Protection from Allah), for the taming of the Quraish,
(And with all those Allah's Grace and Protections for their taming, We cause) the (Quraish) caravans to set forth safe in winter (to the south), and in summer (to the north without any fear),
So let them worship (Allah) the Lord of this House (the Ka'bah in Makkah).
(He) Who has fed them against hunger, and has made them safe from fear.
Have you seen him who denies the Recompense?
That is he who repulses the orphan (harshly),
And urges not the feeding of AlMiskin (the poor),
So woe unto those performers of Salat (prayers) (hypocrites),
Who delay their Salat (prayer) from their stated fixed times,
Those who do good deeds only to be seen (of men),
And refuse Al-Ma'un (small kindnesses e.g. salt, sugar, water, etc.).
Verily, We have granted you (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)) Al-Kauthar (a river in Paradise);
Therefore turn in prayer to your Lord and sacrifice (to Him only).
For he who makes you angry (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)), - he will be cut off (from every good thing in this world and in the Hereafter).
Say (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)to these Mushrikun and Kafirun): "O Al-Kafirun (disbelievers in Allah, in His Oneness, in His Angels, in His Books, in His Messengers, in the Day of Resurrection, and in Al-Qadar, etc.)!
"I worship not that which you worship,
"Nor will you worship that which I worship.
"And I shall not worship that which you are worshipping.
"Nor will you worship that which I worship.
"To you be your religion, and to me my religion (Islamic Monotheism)."
When comes the Help of Allah (to you, O Muhammad (Peace be upon him) against your enemies) and the conquest (of Makkah),
And you see that the people enter Allah's religion (Islam) in crowds,
So glorify the Praises of your Lord, and ask for His Forgiveness. Verily, He is the One Who accepts the repentance and forgives.
Perish the two hands of Abu Lahab (an uncle of the Prophet), and perish he!
His wealth and his children (etc.) will not benefit him!
He will be burnt in a Fire of blazing flames!
And his wife too, who carries wood (thorns of Sadan which she used to put on the way of the Prophet (Peace be upon him), or use to slander him).
In her neck is a twisted rope of Masad (palm fibre).
Say (O Muhammad (Peace be upon him)): "He is Allah, (the) One.
"Allah-us-Samad (The Self-Sufficient Master, Whom all creatures need, He neither eats nor drinks).
"He begets not, nor was He begotten;
"And there is none co-equal or comparable unto Him."
Say: "I seek refuge with (Allah) the Lord of the daybreak,
"From the evil of what He has created;
"And from the evil of the darkening (night) as it comes with its darkness; (or the moon as it sets or goes away).
"And from the evil of the witchcrafts when they blow in the knots,
"And from the evil of the envier when he envies."
Say: "I seek refuge with (Allah) the Lord of mankind,
"The King of mankind,
"The Ilah (God) of mankind,
"From the evil of the whisperer (devil who whispers evil in the hearts of men) who withdraws (from his whispering in one's heart after one remembers Allah),
"Who whispers in the breasts of mankind,
"Of jinns and men."
